Colorado, session 2026A, HB1113.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-1-104, amend
(19.5)(a)(III), (19.5)(a)(VII), (49.9), and (51); and repeal (26) as follows:
1-1-104. Definitions.
As used in this code, unless the context otherwise requires:
(19.5) (a) "Identification" means:
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(III) A valid United States passport OR PASSPORT CARD;
(VII) (A) A copy of a current utility bill, bank statement,
government check, paycheck, or other government document that shows the
name and address of the elector;
(B) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SUBSECTION (19.5)(a)(VII), A
GOVERNMENT DOCUMENT INCLUDES A DIVISION OF YOUTH SERVICES
IDENTIFICATION CARD ISSUED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES TO
THE ELECTOR OR WRITTEN CORRESPONDENCE FROM THE COUNTY SHERIFF,
OR THE SHERIFF'S DESIGNEE, TO THE COUNTY CLERK INDICATING THAT THE
ELECTOR IS CONFINED IN A COUNTY JAIL OR DETENTION FACILITY.
(26) "Political party district" means an area within a county
composed of contiguous whole election precincts, as designated by the
political party county chairperson.
(49.9) "Video security surveillance recording" means video
monitoring by a device that continuously records a designated location or
a system using motion detection that records one frame or more per minute
until detection of motion triggers continuous recording WHEN MOTION IS
DETECTED.
(51) "Watcher" means an eligible elector other than a candidate on
the ballot who has been selected by a political party chairperson on behalf
of the political party; by a party candidate at a primary election, by an
unaffiliated candidate at a general, congressional vacancy, or nonpartisan
election; or by a person designated by either the opponents or the
proponents in the case of a ballot issue or ballot question. "Watcher" also
means an eligible elector selected by a candidate on the ballot for the office
of United States senator, representative in congress, any state office or
district office of state concern, or any county office who is subject to a
recount. If selected by a political party chairperson or a party candidate, the
watcher must be affiliated with that political party or unaffiliated as shown
in the statewide voter registration system. If selected by an unaffiliated
candidate, the watcher must be unaffiliated as shown in the statewide voter
registration system. A PERSON SHALL NOT BE SELECTED AS A WATCHER IF
THE PERSON HAS BEEN CONVICTED OF ANY ELECTION OFFENSE SPECIFIED IN
ARTICLE 13 OF THIS TITLE 1 OR ANY SIMILAR ELECTION OFFENSE IN ANOTHER
STATE OR HAS BEEN CONVICTED OF COMMITTING OR CONSPIRACY TO COMMIT
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

SEDITION, INSURRECTION, TREASON, CONSPIRACY TO OVERTHROW
GOVERNMENT BY USE OF PHYSICAL FORCE OR VIOLENCE, OR ANY SIMILAR
FEDERAL OFFENSE.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-1-107, add (2)(e) as
follows:
1-1-107. Powers and duties of secretary of state - penalty.
(2) In addition to any other powers prescribed by law, the secretary
of state has the following powers:
(e) (I) TO, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE GOVERNOR AND, AS
PRACTICABLE, THE ELECTION EMERGENCY ADVISORY GROUP ESTABLISHED
IN SUBSECTION (2)(e)(II) OF THIS SECTION, ADOPT RULES AS NECESSARY FOR
THE PROPER ADMINISTRATION OF AN ELECTION AND TO GIVE EFFECT TO
SECTION 1-1-103 (1), IF THE GOVERNOR DECLARES A DISASTER EMERGENCY
PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-33.5-704 (4) DUE TO THE INABILITY TO STRICTLY
COMPLY WITH THIS CODE, INCLUDING THE SUSPENSION OF ANY LAW
PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-33.5-704 (7)(a).
(II) IF THE GOVERNOR DECLARES A DISASTER EMERGENCY PURSUANT
TO SECTION 24-33.5-704 (4) DUE TO INABILITY TO STRICTLY COMPLY WITH
THIS CODE, THE GOVERNOR SHALL ESTABLISH THE ELECTION EMERGENCY
ADVISORY GROUP. THE SECRETARY OF STATE AND GOVERNOR SHALL
CONSULT AS PRACTICABLE WITH THE ELECTION EMERGENCY ADVISORY
GROUP ON EMERGENCY ORDERS OR RULES THAT THE SECRETARY OF STATE
MAY ADOPT AS MAY BE NECESSARY TO ENSURE THE PROPER
ADMINISTRATION OF AN ELECTION AND TO GIVE EFFECT TO SECTION 1-1-103
(1).
(III) THE ELECTION EMERGENCY ADVISORY GROUP CONSISTS OF SIX
MEMBERS APPOINTED AS FOLLOWS:
(A) ONE REPRESENTATIVE FROM THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE,
APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR;
(B) ONE REPRESENTATIVE FROM THE SECRETARY OF STATE'S OFFICE,
APPOINTED BY THE SECRETARY OF STATE;
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

(C) TWO CURRENT OR FORMER COUNTY CLERKS FROM DIFFERENT
MAJOR POLITICAL PARTIES, APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR IN CONSULTATION
WITH THE SECRETARY OF STATE; AND
(D) TWO INDIVIDUALS FROM DIFFERENT MAJOR POLITICAL PARTIES,
WITH EXPERTISE ON STATE OR FEDERAL ELECTION LAW, ADMINISTERING
ELECTIONS, VOTING, OR ANOTHER RELEVANT TOPIC, APPOINTED BY THE
GOVERNOR IN CONSULTATION WITH THE SECRETARY OF STATE.
(IV) THIS SUBSECTION (2)(e) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JANUARY 31,
2031.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-1-108, amend (1) as
follows:
1-1-108. Copies of election laws and manual provided.
(1) No later than sixty days after each adjournment of the general
assembly, the secretary of state shall transmit PROVIDE to the county clerk
and recorder of each county ACCESS TO a complete, updated copy of the
pertinent sections of the election laws of the state.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-1-110, add (3.7) as
follows:
1-1-110. Powers of county clerk and recorder and deputy -
communication to electors.
(3.7) AS THE CHIEF ELECTION OFFICIAL FOR THE COUNTY, AND TO
COMPLY WITH THIS CODE AND THE RULES AND ORDERS ESTABLISHED BY THE
SECRETARY OF STATE, THE COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER SHALL SET
OPERATIONAL HOURS FOR THE CLERK AND RECORDER'S OFFICE.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 1-2-213.5 as
follows:
1-2-213.5. Institutions of higher education - electronic voter
registration option - information to students.
(1) (a) Any state AN institution of higher education as defined in
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

section 23-1-108 (7)(g)(II), C.R.S., that utilizes USES an electronic course
registration process shall provide to each student registering electronically
for courses at the institution the opportunity to register to vote by giving
each student the option to be electronically directed to the official website
of the secretary of state so that he or she THE STUDENT may register in
accordance with section 1-2-202.5. The option shall be provided to students
either during or immediately following the electronic registration period for
each term or semester.
(b) Each state institution of higher education subject to paragraph
(a) of this subsection (1) SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION shall
implement the electronic voter registration option as soon as practicable, but
not later than the next regularly scheduled maintenance to its electronic
course registration system process.
(c) Each state institution of higher education subject to subsection
(1)(a) of this section shall, during the first full week of each fall semester
and during the last full week of each spring semester, provide by email to
each enrolled student information on voter eligibility and on how to register
to vote or update their voter registration information in the statewide voter
registration database.
(d) EACH INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION SUBJECT TO
SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION SHALL, ON BOTH THE FIFTEENTH DAY
AND THE FINAL DAY PRIOR TO EACH ELECTION DAY, PROVIDE BY EMAIL TO
EACH ENROLLED STUDENT THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
(I) THE LOCATION AND HOURS OF OPERATION OF EACH CAMPUS
VOTER SERVICE AND POLLING CENTER, INCLUDING THE BUILDING NAME AND
ADDRESS, AND THE REQUIREMENT TO BRING IDENTIFICATION TO VOTE; AND
(II) EACH DROP-OFF LOCATION ON CAMPUS, THE REQUIREMENT FOR
IDENTIFICATION FOR CERTAIN MAIL BALLOTS, AND HOW TO ACCESS MAIL ON
CAMPUS.
(e) EACH INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION SUBJECT TO
SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION MAY INCLUDE IN THE EMAIL REQUIRED
BY SUBSECTION (1)(d) OF THIS SECTION INFORMATION CREATED AND MADE
AVAILABLE BY THE SECRETARY OF STATE CONCERNING:
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

(I) VOTER ELIGIBILITY, INCLUDING RESIDENCY REQUIREMENTS AND
NONRESIDENT STUDENT ELIGIBILITY TO VOTE IN ELECTIONS IN THE STATE;
AND
(II) HOW TO REGISTER TO VOTE OR UPDATE VOTER INFORMATION IN
THE STATEWIDE VOTER REGISTRATION DATABASE, THE LAST DAY TO
REGISTER TO VOTE ONLINE AND RECEIVE A BALLOT IN THE MAIL PRIOR TO AN
ELECTION, AND OPTIONS FOR REGISTERING IN PERSON ON OR BEFORE
ELECTION DAY.
(2) A state AN institution of higher education that does not utilize
USE an electronic course registration process shall provide to students
information regarding how to register to vote IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTIONS (1)(c) AND (1)(d) OF THIS SECTION, including, at a minimum,
prominently posting such information in a clearly visible area of the
institution's registrar's office. SUCH AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION
MAY ALSO PROVIDE TO STUDENTS INFORMATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (1)(e) OF THIS SECTION, INCLUDING BY PROMINENTLY POSTING
SUCH INFORMATION IN A CLEARLY VISIBLE AREA OF THE CAMPUS.
(3) (a) THE SECRETARY OF STATE SHALL ADOPT RULES SPECIFYING
THE FORM AND REQUIRED CONTENT FOR THE INFORMATION REQUIRED BY
SUBSECTIONS (1)(c), (1)(d), (1)(e), AND (2) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) PRIOR TO SENDING AN EMAIL REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (1)(c) OR
(1)(d) OF THIS SUBSECTION OR POSTING A SIGN PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION SHALL PROVIDE
THE ELECTION-SPECIFIC CONTENT OF THE EMAIL OR SIGN TO THE COUNTY
CLERK AND RECORDER FOR THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE INSTITUTION OF
HIGHER EDUCATION IS LOCATED.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-2-222, amend (4) as
follows:
1-2-222. Errors in recording of affiliation.
(4) Printed affidavit forms must be furnished to the election judges
of the various election precincts MADE AVAILABLE BY THE COUNTY CLERK
AND RECORDER. The affidavit form must be substantially as follows:
STATE OF COLORADO )
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

) ss.
County of ...........................................................)
I, ...................., believing an error has been made as to the recording
of my party affiliation, or a change unlawfully made, or a withdrawal
unlawfully made in the statewide voter registration system, do solemnly
swear, or affirm, that the party affiliation as now shown in the statewide
voter registration system is an error, or has been unlawfully changed, or has
been unlawfully withdrawn and that my correct party affiliation should be
.................... instead of .................... and request that the party affiliation be
corrected in the statewide voter registration system. My correct affiliation
was made on or before .................... (date).
Dated ....................
Signed ....................
Subscribed and sworn to before me this ........... day of ...............,
20....
..................................................................
Election Judge or County Clerk
County ......................................................
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-2-227, amend (2);
and add (3) as follows:
1-2-227. Custody and preservation of records.
(2) The voter information provided by a preregistrant who will not
turn eighteen years of age OLD by the date of the next election shall be kept
confidential in the same manner as, and using the programs developed for,
information that is kept confidential pursuant to section 24-72-204 (3.5).
Nothing in this subsection (2) shall be construed to require any request,
application, or fee for such confidentiality. When the preregistrant will be
IS eighteen years of age on the date of the next election OLD, such
information is no longer confidential under this subsection (2).
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

(3) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2027, THE SECRETARY OF STATE SHALL
ENSURE THAT THE VOTER INFORMATION PROVIDED BY A PREREGISTRANT
WHO IS SEVENTEEN YEARS AND SIX MONTHS OLD IS ACCESSIBLE TO THAT
PREREGISTRANT AND SHALL ALLOW SUCH A PREREGISTRANT TO UPDATE
THEIR VOTER INFORMATION USING THE ONLINE VOTER REGISTRATION
SYSTEM CREATED IN SECTION 1-2-202.5 IF THE PREREGISTRANT PROVIDES
THEIR NAME, ZIP CODE, DATE OF BIRTH, AND EITHER THE LAST FOUR DIGITS
OF THEIR SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER OR THEIR DRIVER'S LICENSE OR
STATE-ISSUED IDENTIFICATION NUMBER.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-2-301, add (7) as
follows:
1-2-301. Centralized statewide registration system - secretary of
state to maintain computerized statewide voter registration list - county
computer records - agreement to match information - definition.
(7) (a) THE STATEWIDE VOTER REGISTRATION SYSTEM MUST SUPPORT
THE INTEGRATION AND USE OF GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION SYSTEM DATA TO
IMPROVE THE ACCURACY, CONSISTENCY, AND RELIABILITY OF VOTER
REGISTRATION RECORDS.
(b) THE SECRETARY OF STATE MAY INCORPORATE GEOGRAPHIC
INFORMATION SYSTEM FUNCTIONALITY INTO THE STATEWIDE VOTER
REGISTRATION SYSTEM TO:
(I) VALIDATE AND MAINTAIN VOTER RESIDENTIAL AND MAILING
ADDRESS INFORMATION USING SPATIAL DATA, PARCEL DATA, OR OTHER
GEOGRAPHIC REFERENCE LAYERS;
(II) IMPROVE THE ACCURACY OF PRECINCT, DISTRICT, AND
JURISDICTIONAL ASSIGNMENTS;
(III) SUPPORT TIMELY AND ACCURATE IMPLEMENTATION OF DISTRICT
BOUNDARY CHANGES RESULTING FROM REDISTRICTING OR OTHER LAWFUL
ADJUSTMENTS; AND
(IV) REDUCE UNDELIVERABLE ELECTION MAIL, IMPROVE MAIL
BALLOT DELIVERY EFFICIENCY, AND MINIMIZE THE NEED FOR CORRECTIVE OR
REPLACEMENT BALLOTS.
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

(c) GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION SYSTEM DATA USED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION (7) SHALL NOT BE USED TO DETERMINE VOTER ELIGIBILITY,
CHALLENGE A VOTER'S REGISTRATION, OR RESTRICT A REGISTERED
ELECTOR'S RIGHT TO VOTE.
(d) THE SECRETARY OF STATE MAY ADOPT RULES AS NECESSARY TO
IMPLEMENT THIS SUBSECTION (7), INCLUDING RULES GOVERNING DATA
SOURCES, DATA SHARING WITH COUNTY CLERKS AND RECORDERS, DATA
SECURITY, AND PROCEDURES FOR RESOLVING ADDRESS DISCREPANCIES.
(e) THE SECRETARY OF STATE SHALL ENSURE THAT THE STATEWIDE
VOTER REGISTRATION SYSTEM FULLY IMPLEMENT GEOGRAPHIC
INFORMATION SYSTEM FUNCTIONALITY AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION (7) NO LATER THAN JULY 1, 2029.
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 1-2-401 as
follows:
1-2-401. Legislative declaration.
It is the intent of the general assembly that, in order to promote and
encourage voter registration of all eligible electors in the state, registration
should be made as convenient as possible. It is determined by the general
assembly that if voter registration is convenient, the number of registered
voters will increase. It is further determined by the general assembly that
support and cooperation of school officials and interested citizens will make
high school registration successful. It is therefore the purpose of this part 4
to encourage voter registration by providing convenient registration
procedures for qualified high school students, employees, and other persons
by using high school deputy registrars LIAISONS.
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 1-2-402 as
follows:
1-2-402. Registration by high school liaisons - rules.
(1) Each principal of a public high school, or the principal's
designee who is a registered voter in the county STATE, may serve as a
deputy registrar HIGH SCHOOL LIAISON. The principal of each high school
shall notify the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the high
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

school is located of the name of the school's deputy registrar HIGH SCHOOL
LIAISON, and the county clerk and recorder shall maintain a list of the names
of all of the high school deputy registrars LIAISONS in that county in a public
file.
(2) The high school deputy registrar LIAISON may register or
preregister any student, employee of the school, other person who attends
school functions, or any other person who is eligible to register or
preregister to vote. Voter registration may be made available only when the
school is open for classes or any other school or community function. The
high school deputy registrar LIAISON shall take registrations or
preregistrations only on school district premises.
(3) A high school deputy registrar LIAISON may have available an
official application form for voter registration for each student who is
eighteen years of age OLD or who will be eighteen years of age OLD at the
time of the next election. A high school deputy registrar LIAISON may have
available an official application form for preregistration for each student
who is fifteen years of age OLD.
SECTION 11. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-2-403, amend (1),
(2), and (3)(b); and repeal (3)(a) as follows:
1-2-403. Training and registration materials for high school
liaisons - processing applications.
(1) The county clerk and recorder shall train and supervise the high
school deputy registrars LIAISONS, and, after training is completed, shall
administer the oath of office to the high school deputy registrars LIAISONS.
(2) The county clerk and recorder shall issue sufficient materials to
each high school deputy registrar LIAISON for the registration or
preregistration of all eligible students, employees, and other persons at the
high school which the high school deputy registrar LIAISON serves. The high
school deputy registrar shall give a receipt to the county clerk and recorder
for all materials issued.
(3) (a) The high school deputy registrar shall stamp the application
for registration or preregistration with a validation stamp and provide the
applicant with a receipt verifying the application.
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

(b) (I) Except as provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (b)
SUBSECTION (3)(b)(II) OF THIS SECTION, the high school deputy registrar
LIAISON shall forward applications and changes on a weekly basis to the
county clerk and recorder of the county in which the high school is located.
(II) (A) During the last week allowed for registration applications
submitted by mail prior to any election, the high school deputy registrar
LIAISON shall forward applications daily to the county clerk and recorder of
the county in which the high school is located.
(B) Within eight days prior to an election, a high school deputy
registrar LIAISON shall accept an application tendered under this section and
shall immediately inform the applicant that, to vote in the upcoming
election, the voter must go to a voter service and polling center.
SECTION 12. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 1-2-603 as
follows:
1-2-603. Notification that elector has moved and registered in
different county.
(1) If the elector registers to vote in another county, the county clerk
and recorder of the elector's new county of residence shall transfer the
elector's registration record from the old county in accordance with the
following requirements: IF THE ELECTOR PROVIDES A NAME AND AT LEAST
TWO OF THE FOLLOWING IDENTIFIERS THAT MATCH THE ELECTOR'S PRIOR
REGISTRATION RECORD: DATE OF BIRTH, PRIOR RESIDENCE, DRIVER'S LICENSE
OR IDENTIFICATION CARD NUMBER, OR THE LAST FOUR DIGITS OF THE
ELECTOR'S SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER.
(a) If the elector provides a name, date of birth, and prior address
and the county clerk and recorder can match the name, date of birth, and
prior address to the elector's prior registration record, the elector's
registration record shall be transferred from the old county.
(b) If the elector provides a name and date of birth but does not
provide a prior address, the elector's registration record shall be transferred
from the old county only if:
(I) The elector provides a driver's license or identification card
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

number, and the county clerk and recorder of the new county of residence
can match the name, date of birth, and driver's license or identification card
number to the elector's prior registration record; or
(II) The elector provides a social security number, and the county
clerk and recorder of the new county of residence can match the name, date
of birth, and social security number to the elector's prior registration record.
(c) If the elector does not provide a prior address, driver's license
number, or social security number, the registration record shall not be
transferred from the old county unless the elector submits additional
information that complies with the requirements of this subsection (1). The
county clerk and recorder of the county of prior residence may send notice
to the elector by forwardable mail to the elector's address of record. Any
such notice shall have a returnable portion that has the return postage
prepaid and is preaddressed to the sending county clerk and recorder, and
shall include an area for the elector to indicate if the elector has moved to
another county and wishes to have his or her THEIR registration record
transferred from the old county.
(2) If a county clerk and recorder receives a notice from the
secretary of state or from an election official in another state that the elector
has registered to vote in another state, the county clerk and recorder of the
county of prior residence shall cancel the registration record if the name and
birth date or the name and social security number of the elector match. AND
AT LEAST TWO OF THE FOLLOWING IDENTIFIERS MATCH: DATE OF BIRTH,
PRIOR RESIDENCE, DRIVER'S LICENSE OR IDENTIFICATION CARD NUMBER, OR
LAST FOUR DIGITS OF SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER.
SECTION 13. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-2-604, amend (3)(a)
as follows:
1-2-604. Cancellation of electors with multiple registrations.
(3) (a) The county clerk and recorder may not cancel the registration
record pursuant to subsection (1) of this section unless there is a match in
the county's registration records and the statewide voter registration
database with respect to, at a minimum, the following types of identifying
information: ELECTOR'S NAME AND AT LEAST TWO OF THE FOLLOWING
IDENTIFIERS: DATE OF BIRTH, PRIOR RESIDENCE, DRIVER'S LICENSE OR
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

IDENTIFICATION CARD NUMBER, OR THE LAST FOUR DIGITS OF THE ELECTOR'S
SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER.
(I) The elector's name, date of birth, and prior residence; or
(II) The elector's name, date of birth, and driver's license number or
social security number.
SECTION 14. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-2-605, amend (7)
as follows:
1-2-605. Canceling registration - procedures.
(7) If an elector whose registration record is marked "Inactive" fails
to update his or her THEIR registration record, fails to respond to any
confirmation card, and fails to vote in any election conducted by the county
clerk and recorder during the time period that includes two consecutive
general elections since the elector's registration record was marked
"Inactive", the county clerk and recorder SECRETARY OF STATE shall cancel
the elector's registration record. Nothing in this section allows an elector's
registration record to be canceled solely for failure to vote, OR PROHIBITS
THE SECRETARY OF STATE FROM REQUESTING ASSISTANCE FROM A COUNTY
CLERK AND RECORDER TO CARRY OUT THE DUTIES DESCRIBED IN THIS
SUBSECTION (7).
SECTION 15. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-4-304, amend (5)
as follows:
1-4-304. Presidential electors.
(5) (a) Each presidential elector shall vote for the presidential
candidate and, by separate ballot, vice-presidential candidate who received
the highest number of votes at the preceding general election in this THE
state.
(b) IF A PRESIDENTIAL CANDIDATE OR VICE-PRESIDENTIAL
CANDIDATE NOMINATED BY A POLITICAL PARTY DIES OR WITHDRAWS AS A
CANDIDATE FOR THAT OFFICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE RULES OF THE
POLITICAL PARTY AFTER ACCEPTING NOMINATION BUT PRIOR TO THE
MEETING OF PRESIDENTIAL ELECTORS PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION, AN
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

ELECTOR'S VOTE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5)(a) OF THIS SECTION FOR
SUCH PRESIDENTIAL CANDIDATE OR VICE-PRESIDENTIAL CANDIDATE REFERS
TO THE SUCCESSOR CANDIDATE NOMINATED BY THE POLITICAL PARTY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE RULES OF THE POLITICAL PARTY. ANY VOTE FOR A
SUCCESSOR CANDIDATE PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (5)(b) IS NOT A
VIOLATION OF SECTION 1-13-725.
SECTION 16. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-4-401, amend (1)
and (2); and add (3) as follows:
1-4-401. Time of congressional vacancy elections.
(1) Except as provided in section 1-4-401.5, when any vacancy
occurs in the office of representative in congress from this state, the
governor shall, WITHIN SEVEN DAYS OF THE VACANCY, set a day to hold an
election to fill the vacancy and cause notice of the election to be given as
required in part 2 of article 5 of this title; but no congressional vacancy
election shall be held during the ninety days prior to a general election. or
less than eighty-five days or more than one hundred days after the vacancy
occurs IF THE VACANCY OCCURS BETWEEN ONE HUNDRED FIFTY AND NINETY
DAYS PRIOR TO A REGULARLY SCHEDULED STATEWIDE PRESIDENTIAL
PRIMARY, PRIMARY, OR COORDINATED ELECTION, THE CONGRESSIONAL
VACANCY ELECTION SHALL BE HELD AS PART OF THAT ELECTION. IF THE
VACANCY OCCURS OUTSIDE THE PERIOD BETWEEN ONE HUNDRED FIFTY DAYS
AND NINETY DAYS PRIOR TO A REGULARLY SCHEDULED STATEWIDE
PRESIDENTIAL PRIMARY, PRIMARY, OR COORDINATED ELECTION, THE
CONGRESSIONAL VACANCY ELECTION SHALL BE HELD NO LESS THAN NINETY
DAYS AND NO MORE THAN ONE HUNDRED TWENTY DAYS AFTER THE
VACANCY OCCURS.
(2) A congressional vacancy election HELD AS A SEPARATE ELECTION
shall be conducted and the results thereof surveyed and certified in all
respects as nearly as practicable in like manner as for ACCORDING TO THE
PROVISIONS THAT GOVERN general elections, except as otherwise provided
in this code.
(3) A CONGRESSIONAL VACANCY ELECTION HELD AS PART OF A
REGULARLY SCHEDULED STATEWIDE ELECTION SHALL BE CONDUCTED AND
THE RESULTS THEREOF SURVEYED AND CERTIFIED IN ALL RESPECTS
ACCORDING TO THE PROVISIONS GOVERNING THAT REGULARLY SCHEDULED
PAGE 14-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

STATEWIDE ELECTION, EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS CODE.
SECTION 17. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-4-402, amend
(1)(a), (1)(c), and (2); and add (3) as follows:
1-4-402. Nominations of political party candidates.
(1) (a) Any convention of delegates of a political party or any
committee authorized by resolution of the convention shall nominate a
candidate to fill a vacancy in the unexpired term of a representative in
congress. A state central committee, its managing or executive committee
selected pursuant to section 1-3-105 (2), or any other committee designated
by the bylaws of the state central committee to convene a convention to
nominate a candidate to fill a vacancy in the unexpired term of a
representative in congress shall convene the convention and shall provide
the procedure for the nomination of the candidate. A copy of the notice of
election, as set by the governor and filed with the secretary of state, shall be
sent by certified EMAIL OR mail to the state chairperson of each political
party.
(c) No convention shall be held later than the twentieth day from the
date of the order issued by the governor FIVE DAYS PRIOR TO THE DEADLINE
FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE TO CERTIFY BALLOT CONTENT FOR THE
ELECTION.
(2) The nomination to fill the vacancy in the unexpired term of a
representative in congress made by the political party convention or a
committee authorized by the convention shall be certified by affidavit of the
presiding officer and secretary of the convention or committee ON A FORM
PROVIDED BY THE SECRETARY OF STATE.
(3) (a) ANY VACANCY IN NOMINATION WHICH OCCURS AFTER THE
DATE OF THE CONVENTION OR COMMITTEE DESCRIBED IN THIS SECTION
SHALL BE FILLED BY THE PARTY IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARTY RULES.
(b) WHEN A VACANCY IN A PARTY NOMINATION IS FILLED PRIOR TO
THE BALLOTS BEING PRINTED, THE SECRETARY OF STATE SHALL DIRECT EACH
COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER TO PRINT THE NAME OF THE REPLACEMENT
CANDIDATE ON THE BALLOT.
PAGE 15-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

(c) WHEN A VACANCY IN A PARTY NOMINATION IS FILLED
SUBSEQUENT TO THE BALLOTS BEING PRINTED, THE SECRETARY OF STATE
SHALL DIRECT EACH COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER TO:
(I) PROMINENTLY POST, ON THE DESIGNATED ELECTION OFFICIAL'S
WEBSITE AND IN EACH VOTER SERVICE AND POLLING CENTER, A NOTICE OF
THE VACANCY AND THE NAME OF THE REPLACEMENT CANDIDATE; AND
(II) EITHER PRINT AND PLACE ON THE SAMPLE BALLOT, WHICH IS
DELIVERED TO THE ELECTION JUDGES AND POSTED PURSUANT TO SECTION
1-5-413, A STICKER OF A DIFFERENT COLOR THAN THE SAMPLE BALLOT
INDICATING THE NAME OF THE REPLACEMENT CANDIDATE OR REPRINT THE
SAMPLE BALLOT WITH THE NAME OF THE REPLACEMENT CANDIDATE IN A
DIFFERENT COLOR.
(d) VOTES CAST FOR THE CANDIDATE WHO VACATED THE
NOMINATION MUST BE COUNTED AS VOTES FOR THE REPLACEMENT
CANDIDATE.
SECTION 18. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 1-4-403 as
follows:
1-4-403. Nomination of unaffiliated candidates for congressional
vacancy election.
(1) Except as provided in section 1-4-401.5, candidates for congress
at a congressional vacancy election who do not wish to affiliate with a
major political party may be nominated pursuant to the provisions of section
1-4-802.
(2) Petitions must be filed by 5 p.m. on the twentieth TENTH day
after the date of the order issued by the governor BEFORE THE DEADLINE FOR
THE SECRETARY OF STATE TO CERTIFY THE BALLOT CONTENT FOR THE
ELECTION.
SECTION 19. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 1-4-404 as
follows:
1-4-404. Nomination and acceptance of candidate - arrangement
of names on ballots.
PAGE 16-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

(1) Any person nominated in accordance with this article 4 shall file
a written acceptance with the secretary of state by mail or hand delivery.
The written acceptance must be postmarked or received by the secretary of
state within four business days after the adjournment of the assembly. If an
acceptance is not filed within the specified time, the candidate is deemed to
have declined the nomination, and the nomination must be treated as a
vacancy to be filled as provided in part 10 of this article 4.
(2) THE SECRETARY OF STATE SHALL ARRANGE THE NAMES OF ALL
CANDIDATES WHO HAVE BEEN DULY NOMINATED AND FILED A WRITTEN
ACCEPTANCE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION ON THE
BALLOT UNDER THE DESIGNATION OF THE OFFICE IN THREE GROUPS AS
FOLLOWS:
(a) THE NAMES OF THE CANDIDATES OF THE MAJOR POLITICAL
PARTIES SHALL BE PLACED ON THE BALLOT IN AN ORDER ESTABLISHED BY
LOT AND SHALL COMPRISE THE FIRST GROUP;
(b) THE NAMES OF THE CANDIDATES OF THE MINOR POLITICAL
PARTIES SHALL BE LISTED IN AN ORDER ESTABLISHED BY LOT AND SHALL
COMPRISE THE SECOND GROUP; AND
(c) THE NAMES OF THE UNAFFILIATED CANDIDATES SHALL BE LISTED
IN AN ORDER ESTABLISHED BY LOT AND SHALL COMPRISE THE THIRD GROUP.
SECTION 20. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-4-501, amend (1)
and (2) as follows:
1-4-501. Only eligible electors eligible for office.
(1) No person except an eligible elector who is at least eighteen
years of age OLD, unless another age is required by law, is eligible to hold
any office in this state. No person is eligible to be a designee or candidate
for office AT A PRESIDENTIAL PRIMARY, STATE PRIMARY, GENERAL
ELECTION, CONGRESSIONAL VACANCY ELECTION, OR OTHER COORDINATED
ELECTION unless that person fully meets the qualifications of that office as
stated in the constitution and statutes of THE UNITED STATES OR this state
on or before the date the term of that office begins. The SECRETARY OF
STATE, OR designated election official, AS APPLICABLE, shall not certify the
name of any designee or candidate who fails to swear or affirm under oath
PAGE 17-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

that he or she THEY will fully meet the qualifications of the office if elected;
or who is unable to provide proof that he or she meets THEY MEET any
requirements of the office relating to registration, residence, or property
ownership; or who the SECRETARY OF STATE OR designated election official
determines is not qualified to hold the office that he or she seeks THEY SEEK
based on residency requirements, OR OTHER REQUIREMENTS WHICH ARE
OBJECTIVELY VERIFIABLE SUCH AS AGE, PLACE OF BIRTH, TERM LIMITS, OR
PARTY AFFILIATION. The information found on the person's voter
registration record is admissible as prima facie evidence of compliance with
this section.
(2) No person is eligible to be a candidate for more than one office
at one time; except that this subsection (2) does not apply to memberships
on different special district boards. This subsection (2) shall not prohibit a
candidate or elected official of any political subdivision from being a
candidate or member of the board of directors of any special district or
districts in which he or she is THEY ARE an eligible elector, unless otherwise
prohibited by law.
SECTION 21. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-4-604, amend (3)
as follows:
1-4-604. Filing of petitions and certificates of designation by
assembly - legislative declaration.
(3) Certificates of designation by assembly shall be filed no later
than four days after the adjournment of the assembly. Certificates of
designation may be transmitted by facsimile transmission; however, the
original certificate must also be filed and postmarked no later than ten days
after the adjournment of the assembly.
SECTION 22. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-4-802, amend (1)
introductory portion and (1)(f)(I) as follows:
1-4-802. Petitions for nominating minor political party and
unaffiliated candidates for a partisan office.
(1) Candidates for partisan public offices to be filled at a general or
congressional vacancy election who do not wish to affiliate with a major
political party, AND CANDIDATES FOR A CONGRESSIONAL VACANCY
PAGE 18-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

ELECTION WHO DO NOT WISH TO AFFILIATE WITH ANY POLITICAL PARTY, may
be nominated, other than by a primary election or a convention, in the
following manner:
(f) (I) Except as provided in subsection (1)(f)(II) of this section,
petitions must be filed no later than 5 p.m. on the one hundred seventeenth
day before the general election or, for a congressional vacancy election, no
later than 5 p.m. on the twentieth TENTH day after the date of the order
issued by the governor BEFORE THE DEADLINE FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE
TO CERTIFY THE BALLOT CONTENT FOR THE ELECTION.
SECTION 23. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-4-904, amend (3)
as follows:
1-4-904. Signatures on the petitions.
(3) Unless physically unable, all electors shall sign their own
signature and shall print their names, their respective residence addresses,
including the street number and name, the city or town, the county, and the
date of signature. Each signature on a petition shall be made, to the extent
possible, in black ink.
SECTION 24. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-4-1001, add (3) as
follows:
1-4-1001. Withdrawal or disqualification from candidacy.
(3) IF A PARTY FAILS TO FILL A VACANCY IN NOMINATION BY THE
DEADLINES ESTABLISHED IN THIS PART 10, THAT VACANCY IN NOMINATION
SHALL REMAIN UNFILLED.
SECTION 25. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-4-1002, amend
(3)(a) and (3)(b)(IV) as follows:
1-4-1002. Vacancies in major party designation up to the
sixty-eighth day before primary election day.
(3) (a) No vacancy committee called to fill a vacancy pursuant to
this section may select a person to fill the vacancy at a meeting held for that
purpose unless a written notice announcing the time and location of the
PAGE 19-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

vacancy committee meeting was mailed to each of the committee members
within five TEN calendar days of the chairperson of the central committee
receiving notice of FROM THE DATE the vacancy OCCURS. Mailing of the
notice is effective when the notice is properly addressed and deposited in
the United States mail, with first-class postage prepaid. In addition to this
mailing, the chairperson of the central committee may also contact the
committee members by electronic mail.
(b) (IV) If the vacancy committee fails to timely certify a selection
WITHIN TWENTY CALENDAR DAYS FROM THE DATE THE VACANCY OCCURS,
OR SIXTY-SIX DAYS BEFORE THE DATE OF THE PRIMARY ELECTION,
WHICHEVER IS SOONER, the state chair of the party of the candidate whose
declination, death, disqualification, or withdrawal caused the vacancy,
within seven days, shall fill the vacancy by appointing a person who meets
all of the requirements of candidacy as of the date of the appointment and
who is affiliated with the same political party shown in the statewide voter
registration system as the candidate whose declination, death,
disqualification, or withdrawal caused the vacancy. The name of the person
appointed by the state chair must be certified to the secretary of state OR THE
DESIGNATED ELECTION OFFICIAL.
SECTION 26. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-4-1003, amend
(3)(a), (3)(b)(IV), and (3)(c)(I) as follows:
1-4-1003. Vacancies in major party designation occurring
between the sixty-seventh day before a primary election and the
earliest day to mail primary election ballots.
(3) (a) No vacancy committee called to fill a vacancy pursuant to
this section may select a person to fill a vacancy at a meeting held for that
purpose unless a written notice announcing the time and location of the
vacancy committee meeting was mailed to each of the committee members
within five TEN calendar days of the chairperson of the central committee
learning of FROM THE DATE the vacancy OCCURS. Mailing of the notice is
effective when the notice is properly addressed and deposited in the United
States mail, with first-class postage prepaid. In addition to this mailing, the
chairperson of the central committee may also contact the committee
members by electronic mail.
(b) (IV) If the vacancy committee fails to timely certify a selection
PAGE 20-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

WITHIN TWENTY CALENDAR DAYS FROM THE DATE THE VACANCY OCCURS,
the state chair of the party of the candidate whose declination, death,
disqualification, or withdrawal caused the vacancy, within seven days, shall
fill the vacancy by appointing a person who meets all of the requirements
of candidacy as of the date of the appointment and who is affiliated with the
same political party shown in the statewide voter registration system as the
candidate whose declination, death, disqualification, or withdrawal caused
the vacancy. The name of the person appointed by the state chair must be
certified to the secretary of state OR THE DESIGNATED ELECTION OFFICIAL.
(c) (I) The designation and acceptance of the person selected to fill
the vacancy must be submitted to the designated election official no later
than three days from either the date of the vacancy committee meeting or
from the date of appointment by the state chair pursuant to subsection
(3)(b)(IV) of this section, as applicable; EXCEPT THAT, THE DESIGNATION
AND ACCEPTANCE MUST IN ALL CASES BE SUBMITTED NO LATER THAN THE
DAY BEFORE THE DATE OF THE PRIMARY ELECTION.
SECTION 27. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-4-1004, amend
(3)(a), (3)(b)(IV), (3)(c)(I), and (4)(b) as follows:
1-4-1004. Vacancies in major party designation occurring from
the day after the earliest day to mail primary election ballots through
primary election day.
(3) (a) No vacancy committee called to fill a vacancy pursuant to
this section may select a person to fill a vacancy at a meeting held for that
purpose unless a written notice announcing the time and location of the
vacancy committee meeting was mailed to each of the committee members
within five TEN calendar days of the chairperson of the central committee
learning of FROM THE DATE the vacancy OCCURS. Mailing of the notice is
effective when the notice is properly addressed and deposited in the United
States mail, with first-class postage prepaid. In addition to the mailing, the
chairperson of the central committee may also contact committee members
by electronic mail.
(b) (IV) If the vacancy committee fails to timely certify a selection
WITHIN TWENTY CALENDAR DAYS FROM THE DATE THE VACANCY OCCURS,
OR FIVE DAYS FROM THE DATE OF THE PRIMARY ELECTION, WHICHEVER IS
SOONER, the state chair of the party of the candidate whose declination,
PAGE 21-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

death, disqualification, or withdrawal caused the vacancy, within seven
days, shall fill the vacancy by appointing a person who meets all of the
requirements of candidacy as of the date of the appointment and who is
affiliated with the same political party shown in the statewide voter
registration system as the candidate whose declination, death,
disqualification, or withdrawal caused the vacancy. The name of the person
appointed by the state chair must be certified to the secretary of state OR THE
DESIGNATED ELECTION OFFICIAL.
(c) (I) The designation and acceptance of the person selected to fill
the vacancy must be submitted to the designated election official no later
than three days from either the date of the vacancy committee meeting or
from the date of appointment by the state chair pursuant to subsection
(3)(b)(IV) of this section, as applicable; EXCEPT THAT, THE DESIGNATION
AND ACCEPTANCE MUST IN ALL CASES BE SUBMITTED NO LATER THAN SEVEN
DAYS FROM THE DATE OF THE PRIMARY ELECTION.
(4) When a vacancy in a party nomination is filled pursuant to this
section:
(b) Votes cast for the candidate who vacated the designation must
be counted as votes for the replacement candidate IF A REPLACEMENT
CANDIDATE HAS BEEN CERTIFIED TO THE SECRETARY OF STATE OR THE
DESIGNATED ELECTION OFFICIAL ON OR BEFORE THE DATE OF THE PRIMARY
ELECTION.
SECTION 28. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-4-1005, amend
(3)(a), (3)(b)(IV), and (3)(c)(I) as follows:
1-4-1005. Vacancies in major party nomination occurring from
the day after primary election day through the earliest day to mail
general election ballots.
(3) (a) No vacancy committee called to fill a vacancy pursuant to
this section may select a person to fill a vacancy at a meeting held for that
purpose unless a written notice announcing the time and location of the
vacancy committee meeting was mailed to each of the committee members
within five TEN calendar days of the chairperson of the central committee
learning of FROM THE DATE the vacancy OCCURS. Mailing of the notice is
effective when the notice is properly addressed and deposited in the United
PAGE 22-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

States mail, with first-class postage prepaid. In addition to the mailing, the
chairperson of the central committee may also contact committee members
by electronic mail.
(b) (IV) If the vacancy committee fails to timely certify a selection
WITHIN TWENTY CALENDAR DAYS FROM THE DATE THE VACANCY OCCURS,
the state chair of the party of the candidate whose declination, death,
disqualification, or withdrawal caused the vacancy, within seven days, shall
fill the vacancy by appointing a person who meets all of the requirements
of candidacy as of the date of the appointment and who is affiliated with the
same political party shown in the statewide voter registration system as the
candidate whose declination, death, disqualification, or withdrawal caused
the vacancy. The name of the person appointed by the state chair must be
certified to the secretary of state OR THE DESIGNATED ELECTION OFFICIAL.
The vacancy is filled until the next general election after the vacancy
occurs, when the vacancy is filled by election.
(c) (I) The designation and acceptance of the person selected to fill
the vacancy must be submitted to the designated election official no later
than three days from either the date of the vacancy committee meeting or
from the date of appointment by the state chair pursuant to subsection
(3)(b)(IV) of this section, as applicable; except that such certification
DESIGNATION AND ACCEPTANCE must in all cases be submitted no later than
the sixty-fourth day before the date of the general election.
SECTION 29. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-4-1006, amend (2)
as follows:
1-4-1006. Vacancies in major party nomination occurring from
the day after the earliest day to mail general election ballots through
general election day.
(2) A vacancy occurring from the day after the earliest day to mail
general election ballots through general election day must REMAIN
UNFILLED. IF THE CANDIDATE RECEIVING THE MOST VOTES IN THE ELECTION
IS THE CANDIDATE WHOSE WITHDRAWAL OR DISQUALIFICATION CREATED
THE VACANCY, THE VACANCY IN OFFICE MUST be filled in accordance with
part 2 of article 12 of this code.
SECTION 30. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 1-4-1007 as
PAGE 23-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

follows:
1-4-1007. Vacancies in minor party designation or nomination.
Any vacancy in a nomination for a minor political party candidate
occurring after the filing of the certificate of designation pursuant to section
1-4-1304 (3) and no later than seventy days before the general or
congressional vacancy election, which is caused by the declination, death,
disqualification, or withdrawal of any person nominated by the minor
political party, may be filled by the person or persons designated in the
constitution or bylaws of the minor political party to fill vacancies. THE
DESIGNATION AND ACCEPTANCE OF THE PERSON SELECTED TO FILL THE
VACANCY MUST BE SUBMITTED TO THE DESIGNATED ELECTION OFFICIAL NO
LATER THAN THE SIXTY-FOURTH DAY BEFORE THE DATE OF THE GENERAL
ELECTION.
SECTION 31. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 1-4-1008 as
follows:
1-4-1008. Vacancies in unaffiliated designation or nomination.
Any vacancy in a nomination for an unaffiliated candidate caused by
the declination, death, disqualification, or withdrawal of any person
nominated by petition or statement of intent occurring after the filing of the
petition for nomination and no later than seventy days before the general or
congressional vacancy election may be filled by the person or persons
designated on the petition or statement of intent to fill vacancies. THE
DESIGNATION AND ACCEPTANCE OF THE PERSON SELECTED TO FILL THE
VACANCY MUST BE SUBMITTED TO THE DESIGNATED ELECTION OFFICIAL NO
LATER THAN THE SIXTY-FOURTH DAY BEFORE THE DATE OF THE GENERAL
ELECTION.
SECTION 32. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-4-1203, amend
(4)(a) as follows:
1-4-1203. Presidential primary elections - when - conduct.
(4) (a) A ballot used in a presidential primary election must only
contain the names of candidates for the office of the president of the United
States of America. The ballot shall not be used for the purpose of presenting
PAGE 24-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

any other issue or question to the electorate unless expressly authorized by
law; EXCEPT THAT, A CONGRESSIONAL VACANCY ELECTION MAY BE
PRESENTED ON THE SAME BALLOT USED IN A PRESIDENTIAL PRIMARY IF THE
CONGRESSIONAL VACANCY ELECTION IS HELD ON THE SAME DAY AS THE
PRESIDENTIAL PRIMARY PURSUANT TO SECTION 1-4-401.
SECTION 33. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-4-1304, amend
(1.5)(b)(I), (3), and (4) as follows:
1-4-1304. Nomination of candidates.
(1.5) (b) (I) A minor political party may nominate candidates for
offices to be filled at a general election by assembly. Except as provided in
subsection (1.5)(f) of this section, An assembly shall be held no later than
seventy-three days preceding the primary election.
(3) Any minor political party nominating candidates in accordance
with this part 13 shall file a certificate of designation with the designated
election official no later than four days after the assembly was held at
SIXTY-SEVEN DAYS BEFORE THE PRIMARY ELECTION FOR which the candidate
was designated. The certificate of designation must state the name of the
office for which each person is a candidate and the candidate's name and
address, the date on which the assembly was held at which the candidate
was designated, must designate in not more than three words the name of
the minor political party that the candidate represents, and must certify that
the candidate is a member of the minor political party. The candidate's name
may include one nickname, if the candidate regularly uses the nickname and
the nickname does not include any part of a political party name. The
candidate's affiliation as shown in the statewide voter registration system is
prima facie evidence of party membership.
(4) Any person nominated in accordance with this part 13 shall file
a written acceptance with the designated election official. by mail, facsimile
transmission, or hand delivery The written acceptance must be postmarked
or received by the designated election official no later than four business
days after the filing of the certificate of designation required under
subsection (3) of this section. If the acceptance is transmitted to the
designated election official by facsimile transmission, the original
acceptance must also be filed and postmarked no later than ten days after
the filing of the certificate of designation required under subsection (3) of
PAGE 25-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

this section. If an acceptance is not filed within the specified time, the
candidate shall be deemed to have declined the nomination.
SECTION 34. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-5-102.9, amend
(1)(b.5)(I)(A), (1)(b.5)(III), (1)(b.5)(VI), and (5)(c); and add (2)(c) as
follows:
1-5-102.9. Voter service and polling centers - number required
- services provided - drop-off locations - definition.
(1) (b.5) (I) For a general election, a county clerk and recorder shall
designate a voter service and polling center on the campus of an institution
of higher education, as defined in section 23-3.1-102 (5), located within the
county as follows:
(A) NOTWITHSTANDING THE REQUIREMENT IN SUBSECTION (2) OF
THIS SECTION, during the period from the fifteenth TENTH day before the
election to the second day before the election, one voter service and polling
center on each campus that has ten thousand or more enrolled students; and
(III) A county clerk and recorder shall confer with a state AN
institution of higher education about the location for a voter service and
polling center designated on a campus.
(VI) As used in this subsection (1)(b.5), "campus" means any
collection of buildings and surrounding grounds owned or used by a state
AN institution of higher education to regularly provide students with
education, housing, or college activities. If one or more state institutions of
higher education share buildings or grounds, or if the campuses of one or
more state institutions of higher education are adjacent or otherwise
connected, the shared or connected buildings and grounds constitute a
single campus for the purposes of this subsection (1)(b.5).
(2) Voter service and polling centers must be open, at a minimum,
for the fifteen-day period prior to and including the day of the election as
follows:
(c) ALL VOTER SERVICE AND POLLING CENTERS SHALL REMAIN OPEN
ON ELECTION DAY AS REQUIRED BY THIS SUBSECTION (2). A VOTER SERVICE
AND POLLING CENTER THAT EXPERIENCES A SHORTAGE OF SUPPLIES,
PAGE 26-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

INCLUDING BALLOTS, SHALL NOT CLOSE AND MAY BY REQUIRED TO REMAIN
OPEN AFTER 7 P.M. IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 1-7-101 (1)(b)(I).
(5) (c) Each drop box must accept mail ballots delivered by electors
for the fifteen-day TWENTY-TWO-DAY period prior to and including the day
of the election.
SECTION 35. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-5-106, add (1)(c)
as follows:
1-5-106. Polling location or drop-off location - designation by
sign.
(1) (c) A VOTER SERVICE AND POLLING CENTER ON THE CAMPUS OF
AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION DESIGNATED PURSUANT TO SECTION
1-5-102.9 (1)(b.5)(I) MUST BE:
(I) DESIGNATED BY ONE OR MORE SIGNS POSTED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION;
(II) IDENTIFIED AND DESCRIBED, INCLUDING BY BUILDING NAME AND
ADDRESS AND HOURS OF OPERATION, IN SIGNS CONSPICUOUSLY POSTED
INSIDE AND AT EACH ENTRANCE OF THE STUDENT CENTER, OR OTHER
COMMON AREA, OF THE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION AT LEAST
TWENTY DAYS BEFORE EACH ELECTION AND DURING THE PERIOD POLLING
LOCATIONS ARE OPEN; AND
(III) IDENTIFIED AND DESCRIBED, INCLUDING BY BUILDING NAME
AND ADDRESS AND HOURS OF OPERATION, IN AN EMAIL SENT TO ALL
ENROLLED STUDENTS BY THE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION DURING
THE PERIOD BALLOTS ARE MAILED FOR THE ELECTION PURSUANT TO SECTION
1-7.5-107 (3).
SECTION 36. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-5-203, amend (1)(a)
as follows:
1-5-203. Certification of ballot.
(1) (a) Except as provided in subsection (1)(c) of this section, no
later than sixty days before any primary election, and no later than
PAGE 27-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

fifty-seven days before any general or odd-year November election or
congressional vacancy election, the secretary of state shall deliver by
electronic transmission and registered mail to the county clerk and recorder
of each county a certificate in writing of the ballot order and content for
each county, as follows:
SECTION 37. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-5-404, repeal (3)
as follows:
1-5-404. Arrangement of names on ballots for partisan elections.
(3) The arrangement of names on ballots for congressional vacancy
elections shall be established by lot at any time prior to the certification of
ballots for the congressional vacancy election. The officer in receipt of the
original designation, nomination, or petition of each candidate shall inform
the major political parties, each minor political party, and the
representatives of each political organization on file with the secretary of
state of the time and place of the lot-drawing for the congressional election
ballot. Ballot positions shall be assigned to the major political party, minor
political party, or political organization in the order in which they are
drawn.
SECTION 38. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-5-905, amend (2)
as follows:
1-5-905. Multilingual ballot access - general provisions -
requirements of secretary of state - county clerks.
(2) The secretary of state shall determine which counties in the state
are required to provide multilingual ballot access and, therefore, are
required to create a minority language sample ballot pursuant to section
1-5-906 and provide an in-person minority language ballot pursuant to
section 1-5-907. The secretary of state shall make such determination based
on information provided in the most recent five-year estimates specified in
the United States bureau of the census American community survey or
comparable census data. The secretary of state shall notify the county clerk
of any county that is required to provide a minority language sample ballot
pursuant to section 1-5-906 and provide an in-person minority language
ballot pursuant to section 1-5-907 on or before January 5, 2022, and on or
before January 5 of each even year AND A YEAR FOLLOWING THE RELEASE
PAGE 28-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

OF DATA COLLECTED PURSUANT TO SECTION 203 OF THE FEDERAL "VOTING
RIGHTS ACT OF 1965" BY THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT thereafter. In addition,
on or before January 5, 2022, and on or before January 5 of each even year
OR A YEAR FOLLOWING THE RELEASE OF DATA COLLECTED PURSUANT TO
SECTION 203 OF THE FEDERAL "VOTING RIGHTS ACT OF 1965" BY THE
FEDERAL GOVERNMENT thereafter, the secretary of state shall post a list on
the secretary's website of all counties that are required to provide a minority
language sample ballot pursuant to section 1-5-906 and provide an
in-person minority language ballot pursuant to section 1-5-907.
SECTION 39. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 1-5-603 as
follows:
1-5-603. Adoption and payment for voting machines.
(1) The governing body of any political subdivision may adopt for
use at elections any kind of voting machine fulfilling the requirements for
voting machines set forth in this part 6. These voting machines may be used
at any or all elections held in the political subdivision for casting,
registering, and counting votes. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, the governing body of any political subdivision which adopts and
purchases or leases voting machines shall provide for the payment of the
purchase price or the rent in such manner as may be in the best interest of
the political subdivision and may for that purpose provide for the issuance
of interest-bearing bonds, certificates of indebtedness, or other obligations,
which shall be a charge upon the county. The bonds, certificates of
indebtedness, or other obligations may be made payable at such times, not
exceeding ten years from the date of issue, as may be determined by the
governing body but shall not be issued or sold at less than par.
(2) (a) If the secretary of state certifies a voting system for use in an
election using instant runoff voting in accordance with section 1-5-617
(1.5), the secretary of state shall, if possible, negotiate a single annual
statewide license with the voting system provider to allow each county that
uses the voting system to conduct elections using instant runoff voting. The
secretary of state shall pay for the annual statewide license from the
department of state cash fund created in section 24-21-104 (3)(b).
(b) Each county that uses a voting system in an instant runoff voting
election pursuant to a license obtained by the secretary of state in
PAGE 29-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

accordance with subsection (2)(a) of this section shall reimburse the
secretary of state for its proportionate share of the cost of the annual
statewide license for that year. The secretary of state shall invoice any
county that uses the voting system in an instant runoff voting election for
its share of the cost as a proportion of the number of registered active voters
in all participating municipalities in that county compared to the total
number of registered active voters in all participating municipalities in the
state as determined by the secretary of state pursuant to this section.
SECTION 40. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-5-612, amend (1)(a);
repeal (1)(b); and add (1)(c) and (3) as follows:
1-5-612. Use of electronic and electromechanical voting systems.
(1) (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (1)(b) of this
section, The governing body of any political subdivision may, COUNTY
CLERK AND RECORDER FOR A COUNTY WITH ONE THOUSAND OR MORE
ACTIVE ELECTORS AS OF THE DATE OF THE LAST GENERAL ELECTION MUST
upon consultation with the designated election official BOARD OF COUNTY
COMMISSIONERS, ACQUIRE AND adopt an electronic or electromechanical
voting system, including any upgrade in hardware, firmware, or software,
for use at the polling locations in the political subdivision. The system may
be used for recording, counting, and tabulating votes at all elections held by
the political subdivision. IN ALL ELECTIONS CONDUCTED BY THE COUNTY
UNDER THE "UNIFORM ELECTION CODE OF 1992".
(b) For all elections conducted under the "Uniform Election Code
of 1992", the governing body of any political subdivision shall, upon
consultation with the designated election official, adopt an electronic or
electromechanical voting system to be used for tabulating votes at all
elections held by the political subdivision. The provisions of this subsection
(1)(b) do not apply to counties with fewer than one thousand active electors
as of the date of the last general election.
(c) THE COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER SHALL OVERSEE THE
SELECTION, SUPERVISION, AND MANAGEMENT OF ALL PERSONNEL,
INCLUDING CONTRACTORS AND VENDORS, ENGAGED IN THE ACQUISITION,
IMPLEMENTATION, OPERATION, AND MAINTENANCE OF THE ELECTRONIC OR
ELECTROMECHANICAL VOTING SYSTEM, SUBJECT TO THE RULES OF THE
SECRETARY OF STATE.
PAGE 30-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

(3) (a) THE SECRETARY OF STATE SHALL, IF POSSIBLE, NEGOTIATE A
SINGLE ANNUAL STATEWIDE LICENSE WITH THE VOTING SYSTEM PROVIDER
OF A CERTIFIED VOTING SYSTEM FOR USE IN AN ELECTION USING INSTANT
RUNOFF VOTING PURSUANT TO SECTION 1-5-617 (1.5) TO ALLOW EACH
COUNTY THAT USES THE VOTING SYSTEM TO CONDUCT ELECTIONS USING
INSTANT RUNOFF VOTING. THE SECRETARY OF STATE SHALL PAY FOR SUCH
ANNUAL STATEWIDE LICENSE FROM THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE CASH FUND
CREATED IN SECTION 24-21-104 (3)(b).
(b) EACH COUNTY THAT USES A VOTING SYSTEM IN AN INSTANT
RUNOFF VOTING ELECTION PURSUANT TO A STATEWIDE LICENSE PAID FOR
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3)(a) OF THIS SECTION SHALL REIMBURSE THE
DEPARTMENT OF STATE FOR ITS PROPORTIONATE SHARE OF THE COST OF THE
ANNUAL STATEWIDE LICENSE FOR THE YEAR IN WHICH THE ELECTION IS
HELD. THE SECRETARY OF STATE SHALL PROVIDE AN INVOICE TO EACH
COUNTY THAT USES THE VOTING SYSTEM FOR ITS PROPORTIONATE SHARE OF
THE COST OF THE STATEWIDE LICENSE BASED ON THE NUMBER OF
REGISTERED ACTIVE ELECTORS IN ALL PARTICIPATING MUNICIPALITIES IN
THAT COUNTY COMPARED TO THE TOTAL NUMBER OF REGISTERED ACTIVE
ELECTORS IN ALL PARTICIPATING MUNICIPALITIES IN THE STATE, AS
DETERMINED BY THE SECRETARY OF STATE.
SECTION 41. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-6-101, amend
(7)(c)(VII) as follows:
1-6-101. Qualifications for election judges - student election
judges - legislative declaration.
(7) (c) The designated election officials may work with school
districts and public or private secondary educational institutions to identify
students willing and able to serve as student election judges. Such school
districts or educational institutions may submit the names of the students to
the designated election official of the jurisdiction in which the school
district or educational institution is located for appointment as student
election judges. Home-schooled students may apply to the designated
election official for appointment as a student election judge pursuant to this
section. From among the names submitted, the designated election officials
may select students to serve as student election judges who meet the
following qualifications:
PAGE 31-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

(VII) They are sixteen FIFTEEN years of age OLD or older and either
a junior or senior STUDENT in good standing attending a public or private
secondary educational institution or being home-schooled at the time of the
election to which the student is serving as a student election judge; and
SECTION 42. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 1-6-106 as
follows:
1-6-106. Confirmation and acceptance of election judge
appointment.
(1) The designated election official shall confirm the appointments
of election judges by mailing SENDING each appointed election judge a
certification NOTICE of appointment and an acceptance form IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) The acceptance form NOTICE OF APPOINTMENT SHALL SPECIFY
THE METHOD OF ACCEPTANCE FOR THE APPOINTMENT AS DETERMINED BY
THE DESIGNATED ELECTION OFFICIAL AND shall contain:
(a) The statement of qualifications as prescribed in section 1-6-101;
and
(b) A statement that, if the person appointed as an election judge
either fails to file the acceptance form ACCEPT THE APPOINTMENT within
seven days after the certification NOTICE of appointment and acceptance
form are mailed IS SENT or fails to attend a class of instruction as required
in section 1-6-101 (5), the designated election official may determine that
a vacancy has been created.
(3) Each person appointed as an election judge shall file an
acceptance form in the office of ACCEPT THE APPOINTMENT IN THE MANNER
SPECIFIED BY the designated election official within seven days after the
certification NOTICE of appointment and acceptance form have been mailed
HAS BEEN SENT. If a person appointed as an election judge fails to file the
acceptance form ACCEPT THE APPOINTMENT as described in subsection (2)
of this section or fails to attend a class of instruction as required in section
1-6-101 (5), the designated election official may determine that a vacancy
has been created.
PAGE 32-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

SECTION 43. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-7-101, repeal (2)
as follows:
1-7-101. Hours of voting on election day.
(2) Upon the opening of the polls, a proclamation shall be made by
one of the judges that the polls are open, and, thirty minutes before the
closing of the polls, a proclamation shall be made that the polls will close
in thirty minutes.
SECTION 44. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 1-7-102 as
follows:
1-7-102. Employees entitled to vote.
(1) Eligible electors entitled to vote at an election shall be entitled
to absent themselves for the purpose of voting from any service or
employment in which they are then engaged or employed on the day of the
election for a period of two hours during the time the polls ANY DAY WHEN
VOTER SERVICE AND POLLING CENTERS are open. Any such absence shall not
be sufficient reason for the discharge of any person from service or
employment. Eligible Electors, who so absent themselves shall not be liable
for any penalty, nor shall any deduction be made from their usual salary or
wages, on account of their absence. Eligible Electors who are employed and
paid by the hour shall receive their regular hourly wage for the period of
their absence, not to exceed two hours. Application shall be made for the
leave of absence prior to the day of election FOR WHICH LEAVE IS
REQUESTED. The employer may specify the hours during which the
employee may be absent, but the hours shall be at the beginning or end of
the work shift, if the employee so requests.
(2) This section shall not apply to any person whose AN EMPLOYER
MAY DENY AN ELECTOR'S REQUEST FOR LEAVE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1)
OF THIS SECTION IF THE ELECTOR'S hours of employment on the day of the
election FOR WHICH LEAVE IS REQUESTED are such that there are three or
more CONSECUTIVE hours between the time of opening and the time of
closing of the polls during which the elector is not required to be on the job.
SECTION 45. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-7-118, amend (2)
as follows:
PAGE 33-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

1-7-118. Ranked voting in a coordinated election - procedure -
costs - definition.
(2) A municipality that refers an election using instant runoff voting
to be conducted as part of a coordinated election shall pay for the
reasonable increased costs associated with the use of instant runoff voting
in the coordinated election, including but not limited to costs related to
election setup licensing costs pursuant to section 1-5-603 (2), programming,
ballot design, additional voter information and education, and tabulation.
SECTION 46. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 1-7-119 as
follows:
1-7-119. Voter service and polling centers - electors - use of
mobile phones - printed or written materials.
(1) An elector may take a mobile phone or other electronic device
into a voter service and polling center so long as the elector does not make
or receive any phone calls, except for calls to or from the multilingual ballot
hotline established pursuant to section 1-5-904, or take any pictures or
videos other than images of the elector's own person or ballot.
(2) AN ELECTOR MAY TAKE PRINTED OR WRITTEN MATERIALS OF THE
ELECTOR'S CHOICE INTO A VOTER SERVICE AND POLLING CENTER AS A
RESOURCE TO READ OR CONSULT WHILE MARKING THE ELECTOR'S BALLOT.
SECTION 47. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 1-7-120 as
follows:
1-7-120. Voter service and polling centers - wait times -
reporting.
(1) (a) ON ELECTION DAY, A COUNTY MUST MEASURE AND RECORD
THE WAIT TIME AT EACH OF ITS VOTER SERVICE AND POLLING CENTERS IN
ACCORDANCE WITH RULES ADOPTED BY THE SECRETARY OF STATE.
(b) EACH COUNTY MUST REPORT ITS WAIT TIME DATA RESULTS
DETERMINED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION TO
THE SECRETARY OF STATE NO LATER THAN THIRTY DAYS AFTER THE
ELECTION.
PAGE 34-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

(2) (a) IF A COUNTY REPORTS WAIT TIME DATA RESULTS PURSUANT
TO SUBSECTION (1)(b) OF THIS SECTION INDICATING A WAIT TIME IN EXCESS
OF ONE HOUR AT ANY VOTER SERVICE AND POLLING CENTER, THE COUNTY
MUST SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE SECRETARY OF STATE NO LATER THAN
NINETY DAYS FOLLOWING THE ELECTION, WHICH REPORT MUST INCLUDE THE
FOLLOWING INFORMATION FOR ANY SUCH VOTER SERVICE AND POLLING
CENTER:
(I) THE NUMBER OF ELECTORS WHO USED THE CENTER IN THE
ELECTION;
(II) THE NUMBER OF VOTING BOOTHS PROVIDED;
(III) THE NUMBER OF VOTER CHECK-IN STATIONS AND THE NUMBER
OF ELECTION JUDGES STAFFING THOSE STATIONS;
(IV) THE NUMBER AND STATUS OF ANY BALLOT MARKING DEVICES
AND BALLOT ON DEMAND SYSTEMS IN USE;
(V) THE NUMBER AND STATUS OF ANY PRINTERS AND OTHER
EQUIPMENT IN USE;
(VI) THE NUMBER OF STAFF AVAILABLE TO ASSIST WITH THE
CONDUCT OF THE ELECTION;
(VII) A DESCRIPTION OF THE NUMBER AND TYPES OF BACK-UPS OR
DELAYS THAT OCCURRED AT THE LOCATION IN THE CONDUCT OF THE
ELECTION, INCLUDING THE ACTIVITY INVOLVED, TIME OF OCCURRENCE, THE
KNOWN, PROBABLE, OR POSSIBLE CAUSE OF OR CAUSAL FACTORS THAT MAY
HAVE CONTRIBUTED TO THE BACK-UPS OR DELAYS, AND DETERMINATION OF
WHETHER THE CAUSE OR CAUSAL FACTORS ARE REASONABLY LIKELY TO
PERSIST OR REOCCUR AT FUTURE ELECTIONS;
(VIII) A REMEDIATION PLAN TO AVOID OR MINIMIZE WAIT TIMES
EXCEEDING ONE HOUR, WHICH MAY INCLUDE A PROPOSAL FOR ADDITIONAL
VOTER SERVICE AND POLLING CENTERS OR A PROPOSAL FOR THE USE OF NEW
SITES FOR EXISTING CENTERS, ADDITIONAL CHECK-IN STATIONS, VOTING
BOOTHS, BALLOT MARKING DEVICES AND BALLOT ON DEMAND SYSTEMS,
PRINTERS OR OTHER EQUIPMENT, ADDITIONAL STAFF OR ELECTION JUDGES,
OR CHANGES IN THE ALLOCATION OF DUTIES AMONG ELECTION JUDGES AND
PAGE 35-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

STAFF; AND
(IX) A DESCRIPTION OF THE BARRIERS, IF ANY, THAT MAY PREVENT
THE COUNTY FROM ENSURING ALL FUTURE CENTER WAIT TIMES DO NOT
EXCEED ONE HOUR.
(b) UPON RECEIPT OF A REPORT PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF
THIS SECTION, THE SECRETARY OF STATE SHALL POST THE REPORT ON THE
SECRETARY OF STATE'S WEBSITE NO LATER THAN FIVE DAYS FROM THE DATE
OF RECEIPT.
(c) IF A COUNTY IS REQUIRED TO SUBMIT A REPORT IN ACCORDANCE
WITH SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION, THE COUNTY CLERK AND
RECORDER OR DESIGNATED ELECTION OFFICIAL RESPONSIBLE FOR SENDING
A PROPOSED ELECTION PLAN PURSUANT TO SECTION 1-7.5-105 MUST
INCORPORATE APPROPRIATE REMEDIATION STEPS INTO THE PLAN.
SECTION 48. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal and reenact,
with amendments, 1-7-307 as follows:
1-7-307. Method of counting paper ballots.
(1) IN ANY COUNTY IN WHICH A HAND COUNT OF BALLOTS IS USED OR
BECOMES NECESSARY, AS EXPRESSLY PERMITTED OR REQUIRED BY A
PROVISION OF THIS TITLE 1, DURING AN INITIAL TABULATION, POST-ELECTION
AUDIT, OR RECOUNT, THE DESIGNATED ELECTION OFFICIAL SHALL COUNT THE
BALLOTS IN THE MANNER PRESCRIBED BY THIS SECTION.
(2) EACH BALLOT MUST BE COUNTED BY A TEAM OF FOUR ELECTION
JUDGES. ONE JUDGE MUST AUDIBLY READ EVERY MARK ON THE BALLOT,
WHILE A SEPARATE JUDGE OBSERVES THIS READING AND ASSISTS IN
DETERMINING VOTER INTENT, WHEN NECESSARY. TWO OTHER ELECTION
JUDGES MUST EACH MAKE ENTRIES ON TWO SEPARATE ACCOUNTING FORMS
FOR EACH AUDIBLY READ VOTE. THE SEPARATE ACCOUNTING FORMS MUST
BE COMPARED AT REGULAR INTERVALS AND ANY DISCREPANCIES NOTED ON
THE SEPARATE FORMS MUST BE ACCOUNTED FOR UNTIL AN ACCURATE COUNT
OF ALL BALLOTS COMPARED CAN BE DETERMINED.
(3) THE SECRETARY OF STATE MAY ADOPT RULES IN ACCORDANCE
WITH ARTICLE 4 OF TITLE 24 AS NECESSARY TO ADMINISTER AND ENFORCE
PAGE 36-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

THIS SECTION.
SECTION 49. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-7-507, amend (6)
as follows:
1-7-507. Electronic vote-counting - procedure.
(6) If a software or hardware malfunction, OR OTHER SIGNIFICANT
ISSUE, makes it impossible IMPRACTICABLE to count all or a part of the
ballots with electronic vote-tabulating equipment, the secretary of state,
after consultation with the designated election official, may permit the
designated election official to direct that such ballots be counted manually,
following as far as practicable the provisions governing the counting of
paper ballots as provided in section 1-7-307.
SECTION 50. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 1-7-803 as
follows:
1-7-803. Custody and lawful transfer of election records.
(1) A DESIGNATED ELECTION OFFICIAL MUST NOT TRANSFER
CUSTODY OR CONTROL OF ELECTION RECORDS OR OTHER ELECTION
MATERIALS, AS DESIGNATED BY THE SECRETARY OF STATE, TO A THIRD
PARTY UNLESS THE TRANSFER IS AUTHORIZED OR REQUIRED BY THE
SECRETARY OF STATE OR A MANDATORY LEGAL OBLIGATION IMPOSED BY A
COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION.
(2) THE SECRETARY OF STATE MAY ADOPT RULES AS NECESSARY TO
ADMINISTER AND ENFORCE THIS SECTION, INCLUDING RULES REGARDING THE
CREATION OF AN INVENTORY OF ELECTION RECORDS OR ELECTION
MATERIALS TRANSFERRED DUE TO A MANDATORY LEGAL OBLIGATION
IMPOSED BY A COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION.
(3) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION ALTERS OR AMENDS THE
REQUIREMENTS OR LIMITATIONS FOR OR ANY DUTIES OF A DESIGNATED
ELECTION OFFICIAL WITH RESPECT TO THE DISCLOSURE OF PUBLIC RECORDS
AS SET FORTH IN THE "COLORADO OPEN RECORDS ACT", PART 2 OF ARTICLE
72 OF TITLE 24.
SECTION 51. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-7.5-105, amend
(1)(a), (1.3)(f.5), and (2)(a); and add (2)(d) as follows:
PAGE 37-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

1-7.5-105. Preelection process - rules.
(1) (a) The county clerk and recorder or designated election official
responsible for conducting an election that is to be by mail ballot pursuant
to section 1-7.5-104 (1) shall send a proposed election plan for conducting
the mail ballot election to the secretary of state no later than ninety days
prior to a nonpartisan election or, for any mail ballot election that is
coordinated with or conducted by the county clerk and recorder, no later
than one hundred ten TWENTY days prior to the election. The proposed plan
may be based on the standard plan adopted by the secretary of state by rule.
(1.3) The election plan required under subsection (1) of this section
must include, at a minimum:
(f.5) The information required by section SECTIONS 1-7-120 (2)(c)
AND 1-7.5-113.5 (2); and
(2) (a) The secretary of state shall approve, or disapprove, OR
REQUEST MODIFICATION OF the written plan for conducting a mail ballot
election, in accordance with section 1-7.5-106, within twenty days after
receiving the plan and shall provide a written notice to the affected political
subdivision.
(d) THE SECRETARY OF STATE SHALL RELEASE THE INFORMATION
REQUIRED BY SUBSECTIONS (1.3)(a) AND (1.3)(b) OF THIS SECTION FOR EACH
VOTER SERVICE AND POLLING CENTER DESCRIBED IN AN ELECTION PLAN
SUBMITTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION NO LATER
THAN AUGUST 1 FOR EACH VOTER SERVICE AND POLLING CENTER.
SECTION 52. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-7.5-107, amend
(3)(a)(I), (3)(a)(II), (3.5)(d)(I), and (4.3)(a)(II) as follows:
1-7.5-107. Procedures for conducting mail ballot election -
primary elections - first-time voters casting a mail ballot after having
registered by mail to vote - in-person request for ballot - return
envelope requirements - repeal.
(3) (a) (I) Not sooner than twenty-two TWENTY-NINE days before a
general, primary, or other mail ballot election, and no later than eighteen
TWENTY-FIVE days before the election, the county clerk and recorder or
PAGE 38-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

designated election official shall mail to each active registered elector, at
the last mailing address appearing in the registration records and in
accordance with United States postal service regulations, a mail ballot
packet, which must be marked "DO NOT FORWARD. ADDRESS
CORRECTION REQUESTED.", or any other similar statement that is in
accordance with United States postal service regulations. Nothing in this
subsection (3) affects any provision of this code governing the delivery of
mail ballots to an absent uniformed services elector, nonresident overseas
elector, or resident overseas elector covered by the federal "Uniformed and
Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act", 52 U.S.C. sec. 20301 et seq.
(II) If the twenty-second TWENTY-NINTH day before a general,
primary, or other mail ballot election is a Saturday, Sunday, state legal
holiday, or federal holiday recognized by the United States postal service,
the county clerk and recorder or designated election official may mail ballot
packets pursuant to subsection (3)(a)(I) of this section on the Friday
immediately preceding the twenty-second TWENTY-NINTH day.
(3.5) (d) (I) Any person who desires to cast his or her ballot by mail
but does not satisfy the requirements of subsection (3.5)(b) of this section
may cast such ballot by mail. The county clerk and recorder or designated
election official shall, within three days after the receipt of a mail ballot that
does not contain a copy of identification as defined in section 1-1-104
(19.5), but in no event later than two days after election day, send to the
eligible elector at the address indicated in the registration records and to the
eligible elector's electronic mail address if available a letter explaining the
lack of compliance with subsection (3.5)(b) of this section; EXCEPT THAT,
IF THE COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER FAILS TO SEND THE LETTER REQUIRED
BY THIS SUBSECTION (3.5)(d)(I) WITHIN TWO DAYS AFTER THE ELECTION,
THE COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER MUST SEND THE LETTER TO THE
ELIGIBLE ELECTOR BY OVERNIGHT MAIL OR HAND DELIVERY, OR BY THE
MOST EXPEDIENT METHOD AVAILABLE FOR OVERSEAS AND MILITARY
VOTERS. If the county clerk and recorder or designated election official
receives a copy of identification in compliance with subsection (3.5)(b) of
this section within eight days after election day, and if the mail ballot is
otherwise valid, the mail ballot shall be counted.
(4.3) (a) (II) On and after January 1, 2020, For a presidential
primary or November coordinated election, in addition to the requirements
of subsection (4.3)(a)(I) of this section, the county clerk and recorder shall
PAGE 39-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

establish a drop box on each campus of a state AN institution of higher
education, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 23-3.1-102 (5), located within the county
that has two ONE thousand or more enrolled students as determined in
accordance with section 1-5-102.9 (1)(b.5)(III).
SECTION 53. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-7.5-107.3, amend
(2)(a); and add (1.5)(a.5) as follows:
1-7.5-107.3. Verification of signatures - rules.
(1.5) (a.5) IF THE COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER FAILS TO SEND THE
LETTER AND FORM REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (1.5)(a) OF THIS SECTION
WITHIN TWO DAYS AFTER THE ELECTION, THE COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER
MUST SEND THE LETTER AND FORM TO THE ELIGIBLE ELECTOR BY OVERNIGHT
MAIL OR HAND DELIVERY, OR BY THE MOST EXPEDIENT METHOD AVAILABLE
FOR OVERSEAS AND MILITARY VOTERS.
(2) (a) If, upon comparing the signature of an eligible elector on the
self-affirmation on the return envelope with the signature of the eligible
elector stored in the statewide voter registration system, the election judge
determines that the signatures do not match, or if a signature verification
device used pursuant to subsection (5) of this section is unable to determine
that the signatures match, two other election judges of different political
party affiliations shall simultaneously compare the signatures. If both other
election judges agree that the signatures do not match, the county clerk and
recorder shall, within three days after the signature deficiency has been
confirmed, but in no event later than two days after election day, send to the
eligible elector at the address indicated in the registration records and to the
eligible elector's electronic mail address if available a letter explaining the
discrepancy in signatures and a form for the eligible elector to confirm that
the elector returned a ballot to the county clerk and recorder; EXCEPT THAT,
IF THE COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER FAILS TO SEND THE LETTER AND FORM
REQUIRED BY THIS SUBSECTION (2)(a) WITHIN TWO DAYS AFTER THE
ELECTION, THE COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER MUST SEND THE LETTER AND
FORM TO THE ELIGIBLE ELECTOR BY OVERNIGHT MAIL OR HAND DELIVERY,
OR BY THE MOST EXPEDIENT METHOD AVAILABLE FOR OVERSEAS AND
MILITARY VOTERS. If the county clerk and recorder receives the form within
eight days after election day confirming that the elector returned a ballot to
the county clerk and recorder and enclosing a copy of the elector's
identification as defined in section 1-1-104 (19.5), and if the ballot is
PAGE 40-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

otherwise valid, the ballot shall be counted. If the eligible elector returns the
form indicating that the elector did not return a ballot to the county clerk
and recorder, or if the eligible elector does not return the form within eight
days after election day, the self-affirmation on the return envelope shall be
categorized as incorrect, the ballot shall not be counted, and the county
clerk and recorder shall send copies of the eligible elector's signature on the
return envelope and the signature stored in the statewide voter registration
system to the district attorney for investigation.
SECTION 54. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-7.5-113.5, amend
(4)(a)(I) as follows:
1-7.5-113.5. Voting at county jails or detention centers -
definition.
(4) (a) (I) For a general election, the sheriff's designee shall
coordinate with the county clerk and recorder to provide, at a minimum, one
day of in-person voting for confined eligible electors at the county jail or
detention center. The in-person voting must be open for at least six hours
and be held on any day between the fifteenth day before election day and
the fourth SECOND day before election day AND MUST BE OPEN FOR A
MINIMUM NUMBER OF HOURS BASED ON THE NUMBER OF BEDS AVAILABLE IN
THE COUNTY JAIL OR DETENTION CENTER AS FOLLOWS:
(A) SIX HOURS FOR ONE HUNDRED OR MORE BEDS;
(B) FOUR HOURS FOR FIFTY OR MORE BUT FEWER THAN ONE
HUNDRED BEDS; AND
(C) THREE HOURS FOR ONE OR MORE BUT FEWER THAN FIFTY BEDS.
SECTION 55. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal and reenact,
with amendments, 1-9-101 as follows:
1-9-101. Challenge of incorrect registration.
(1) (a) ANY REGISTERED ELECTOR MAY PROTEST THE REGISTRATION
OF ANY PERSON WHOSE NAME APPEARS IN A COUNTY REGISTRATION RECORD
FOR THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE CHALLENGING ELECTOR RESIDES. A PROTEST
MAY CHALLENGE A PERSON'S REGISTRATION AS INCORRECT BECAUSE THE
PERSON IS:
PAGE 41-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

(I) NOT A CITIZEN OF THE UNITED STATES;
(II) NOT AT LEAST FIFTEEN YEARS OLD;
(III) DECEASED; OR
(IV) NO LONGER A RESIDENT OF THE STATE, BUT HAS NOT YET BEEN
MARKED "INACTIVE" IN THE VOTER REGISTRATION RECORD.
(b) A PROTEST MUST BE SUBMITTED FOR EACH PERSON WHOSE
REGISTRATION IS BEING CHALLENGED. THE PROTEST MUST BE MADE IN
WRITING ON A FORM PRESCRIBED BY THE SECRETARY OF STATE AND MUST
INCLUDE:
(I) THE NAME OF THE PERSON WHOSE REGISTRATION IS CHALLENGED;
(II) THE BASIS FOR THE CHALLENGE, INCLUDING SUPPORTING FACTS;
(III) ALL DOCUMENTARY EVIDENCE SUPPORTING THE FACTUAL BASIS
FOR THE CHALLENGE; AND
(IV) THE SIGNATURE AND ADDRESS OF THE CHALLENGER.
(c) A PROTEST MUST BE FILED WITH THE COUNTY CLERK AND
RECORDER OF THE COUNTY WHERE THE CHALLENGED REGISTRATION RECORD
RESIDES NO LATER THAN ONE HUNDRED TWENTY DAYS BEFORE ANY
ELECTION CONDUCTED BY THAT COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER. A PROTEST
FEE OF FIFTY DOLLARS MUST BE PAID TO THE COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER
RESPONSIBLE FOR ADJUDICATING THE CHALLENGE AT THE TIME THAT A
PROTEST IS SUBMITTED. A FEE PAYMENT IS REQUIRED FOR EACH WRITTEN
PROTEST. IF A PROTEST IS SUCCESSFUL, THE PROTEST FEE MUST BE REFUNDED
TO THE CHALLENGER.
(d) UPON RECEIPT OF A PROTEST, A COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER
SHALL REVIEW THE PROTEST TO DETERMINE IF IT SUFFICIENTLY ALLEGES A
BASIS FOR A CHALLENGE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS
SECTION. IF A PROTEST DOES NOT ALLEGE A SUFFICIENT BASIS FOR A
CHALLENGE PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION, THE COUNTY CLERK AND
RECORDER SHALL DISMISS THE CHALLENGE AND NOTIFY THE CHALLENGER
OF THE DISMISSAL. IF A PROTEST SUFFICIENTLY ALLEGES A BASIS FOR A
PAGE 42-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

CHALLENGE PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION, THE COUNTY CLERK AND
RECORDER SHALL NOTIFY AND MAIL A COPY OF THE CHALLENGE TO THE
PERSON WHOSE REGISTRATION IS BEING CHALLENGED. THE COUNTY CLERK
AND RECORDER SHALL NOTIFY THE PERSON WHOSE REGISTRATION IS BEING
CHALLENGED AND THE CHALLENGER OF THE DATE, TIME, AND LOCATION SET
FOR THE CHALLENGE HEARING REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (1)(e) OF THIS
SECTION.
(e) IF A COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER DETERMINES THAT A
PROTEST SUFFICIENTLY ALLEGES A BASIS FOR A CHALLENGE PURSUANT TO
THIS SECTION, THEN THE COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER MUST SET A
HEARING DATE THAT IS NO LATER THAN THIRTY DAYS FROM THE DATE THE
PROTEST WAS FILED AND MUST PROVIDE NOTICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (1)(d) OF THIS SECTION. THE CHALLENGER WHO SUBMITTED THE
PROTEST MUST APPEAR AT THE HEARING AND SHALL BEAR THE BURDEN OF
PROVING THE ALLEGATIONS MADE IN THE PROTEST ARE TRUE. THE PERSON
WHOSE REGISTRATION IS BEING CHALLENGED MUST HAVE THE OPPORTUNITY
TO APPEAR AT THE HEARING, BUT MAY NOT BE PENALIZED OR SUBJECT TO A
NEGATIVE PRESUMPTION OR INFERENCE IF THEY DO NOT APPEAR. THE
COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER SHALL CONDUCT THE HEARING AND MAY
RECEIVE EVIDENCE AND HEAR TESTIMONY. NO LATER THAN FIVE DAYS
AFTER THE DATE OF THE HEARING, BUT IN NO EVENT LATER THAN NINETY
DAYS BEFORE AN ELECTION CONDUCTED BY THE COUNTY CLERK AND
RECORDER, THE COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER MUST RENDER A DECISION
IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (1)(f) OF THIS SECTION AND NOTIFY BOTH
PARTIES OF THE DECISION.
(f) IN RENDERING A DECISION AFTER THE HEARING ON A PROTEST, A
COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER MUST PROCEED AS FOLLOWS:
(I) IF THEY FIND SUFFICIENT EVIDENCE TO SUPPORT THE
ALLEGATIONS IN THE PROTEST, AND THE BASIS OF THE CHALLENGE IS THAT
THE PERSON IS DECEASED, LESS THAN FIFTEEN YEARS OLD, OR NOT A CITIZEN
OF THE UNITED STATES, THE COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER SHALL CANCEL
THE PERSON'S VOTER REGISTRATION RECORD IN THE STATEWIDE VOTER
REGISTRATION SYSTEM;
(II) IF THEY FIND SUFFICIENT EVIDENCE TO SUPPORT THE
ALLEGATIONS IN THE PROTEST, AND THE BASIS FOR THE CHALLENGE IS THAT
THE PERSON IS NOT A RESIDENT OF THE STATE, THE COUNTY CLERK AND
PAGE 43-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

RECORDER SHALL MARK THE PERSON'S VOTER REGISTRATION RECORD
"INACTIVE", SEND A CONFIRMATION CARD, AND OTHERWISE FOLLOW THE
REQUIREMENTS OF SECTION 1-2-302.5; OR
(III) IF THEY DO NOT FIND SUFFICIENT EVIDENCE TO SUPPORT THE
ALLEGATIONS IN THE PROTEST, THE COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER SHALL
DENY THE CHALLENGE.
(2) ALL APPEALS FROM A DECISION OF THE COUNTY CLERK AND
RECORDER MUST BE TO THE DISTRICT COURT AND FILED WITHIN THREE DAYS
FROM THE DATE THE DECISION IS ISSUED. AN APPELLANT MUST FILE IN THE
DISTRICT COURT A VERIFIED PETITION SETTING FORTH THE FACTS PRESENTED
AT THE HEARING, IF ANY, THE DECISION OF THE COUNTY CLERK AND
RECORDER, AND THE BASIS FOR THE APPEAL. WITHIN TWENTY-FOUR HOURS,
THE CLERK OF THE DISTRICT COURT MUST MAIL TO THE OTHER PARTY A
NOTICE OF THE APPEAL, INCLUDING THE TIME OF ANY HEARING. A HEARING
MUST BE HELD NO LESS THAN THREE DAYS NOR MORE THAN FIVE DAYS AFTER
THE DATE THE VERIFIED PETITION IS FILED.
(3) (a) A DISTRICT COURT MUST HEAR TESTIMONY AND OTHER
EVIDENCE AND INVESTIGATE SUMMARILY ANY APPEAL FILED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION. ONLY COMPETENT LEGAL EVIDENCE MAY
BE RECEIVED AT THE HEARING OR CONSIDERED BY THE COURT. NO
PRESUMPTION MAY BE MADE AGAINST A PERSON WHOSE REGISTRATION IS
CHALLENGED MERELY BECAUSE OF THEIR FAILURE TO ATTEND THE HEARING.
THE COURT HAS THE POWER TO SUBPOENA ANY PERSON AS A WITNESS AND
TO MAKE ANY NECESSARY INVESTIGATION TO ASCERTAIN THE TRUTH OF ANY
CHARGES MADE IN THE PETITION, IF THE METHOD OF INVESTIGATION DOES
NOT CAUSE UNNECESSARY DELAY OR INTERFERE WITH THE FINAL
DISPOSITION OF THE PROTEST WITHIN THE TIME PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION.
A HEARING ON ANY PETITION IS SUMMARY AND FINAL AND IS NOT SUBJECT
TO DELAY.
(b) AT THE CLOSE OF THE HEARING, THE COURT MUST ANNOUNCE IF
THE PROTEST HAS BEEN SUSTAINED. IF THE PROTEST IS SUSTAINED, THE
COURT SHALL ORDER THE APPROPRIATE REMEDY IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (1)(f) OF THIS SECTION. THE COURT SHALL DIRECT THE CLERK
OF THE COURT TO CERTIFY THE NAME OF THE PERSON WHOSE REGISTRATION
IS CHALLENGED AND THE REMEDY TO THE COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER.
UPON RECEIPT OF THE NAME AND REMEDY, THE COUNTY CLERK AND
PAGE 44-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

RECORDER SHALL TAKE THE ACTION REQUIRED BY THE COURT. THE DECISION
OF THE COURT IS FINAL AND NOT SUBJECT TO REVIEW BY ANY OTHER COURT;
EXCEPT THAT THE SUPREME COURT, IN ITS DISCRETION, MAY REVIEW ANY
SUCH PROCEEDINGS IN A SUMMARY WAY.
SECTION 56. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-12-108, amend
(5)(c) as follows:
1-12-108. Petition requirements - approval as to form -
determination of sufficiency - protest - offenses.
(5) (c) Unless physically unable, all electors shall sign their own
signature and shall print their names, respective residence addresses,
including the street number and name, the city or town, the county, and the
date of signature. Each signature on a petition must be made, to the extent
possible, using a pen. If, while verifying a signer's information against the
registration records in accordance with subsection (8) of this section, the
designated election official finds that the signer provided his or her THEIR
mailing address rather than his or her THEIR residence address, the
designated election official may accept the signature line as valid if the
designated election official is able to locate the signer's record in the
statewide voter registration database and determines that the signer was
eligible to sign the petition.
SECTION 57. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-12-114, amend
(2)(b) as follows:
1-12-114. Mail ballots - plan required - voter service and polling
centers - number required - definition.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of this code:
(b) Not earlier than the twenty-second TWENTY-NINTH day or later
than the eighteenth TWENTY-FIFTH day before the election, the designated
election official shall mail ballots to all active registered electors.
SECTION 58. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-12-201, amend (1)
as follows:
1-12-201. Vacancies in office of United States senator.
PAGE 45-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

(1) When a vacancy occurs in the office of United States senator
from this THE state, the governor shall make a temporary appointment to fill
the vacancy until it is filled by election. THE GOVERNOR SHALL APPOINT A
PERSON WHO IS A MEMBER OF THE SAME POLITICAL PARTY AS THE FORMER
UNITED STATES SENATOR.
SECTION 59. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 1-12-205 as
follows:
1-12-205. Vacancies in county offices.
All vacancies in any county office, except that of county
commissioner, shall be filled by appointment by the board of county
commissioners of the county in which the vacancy occurs. until the next
general election, at which time the vacancy shall be filled by election THE
APPOINTED OFFICIAL SHALL SERVE IN THE COUNTY OFFICE UNTIL THE NEXT
REGULARLY SCHEDULED GENERAL ELECTION, AT WHICH TIME THE
REMAINDER OF THE VACANT TERM, IF ANY, SHALL BE FILLED BY ELECTION.
SECTION 60. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 1-12-209 as
follows:
1-12-209. Terms of persons filling vacancies.
Except for appointments on nonpartisan boards, any officers elected
or appointed to fill vacancies as provided in this article shall qualify and
enter upon the duties of their offices immediately thereafter. If elected or
appointed, the officers shall hold the office during the unexpired term for
which they were elected and OR APPOINTED until their successors are
elected, qualified, and take office on the second Tuesday of January THE
NEXT REGULARLY SCHEDULED GENERAL ELECTION, OR FOR COUNTY
COMMISSIONER OR GENERAL ASSEMBLY VACANCIES, UNTIL THE NEXT
REGULARLY SCHEDULED COORDINATED OR GENERAL ELECTION, WHICHEVER
IS APPLICABLE, AT WHICH TIME THE REMAINDER OF THE VACANT TERM, IF
ANY, SHALL BE FILLED BY ELECTION, except as otherwise provided by law,
in accordance with section 1-1-201.
SECTION 61. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 1-13-711 as
follows:
PAGE 46-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

1-13-711. Interference with voter while voting.
Any person who interferes with any voter who is inside the
immediate voting area, WITHIN ONE HUNDRED FEET OF ANY BUILDING IN
WHICH A POLLING LOCATION OR DROP-OFF LOCATION IS LOCATED, OR WITHIN
ONE HUNDRED FEET OF A DROP BOX or is marking a ballot or operating a
voting device or electronic voting device at any election provided by law
upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.
SECTION 62. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 1-13-713 as
follows:
1-13-713. Intimidation.
It is unlawful for any person directly or indirectly, by himself or
herself or by any other person in his or her behalf, to RECKLESSLY impede,
prevent, MAKE A CREDIBLE THREAT, MENACE, INTIMIDATE, or otherwise
interfere with the free exercise of the elective franchise of any elector,
INCLUDING ANY ELECTOR WHO IS DELIVERING NO MORE THAN TEN MAIL
BALLOTS TO A DROP BOX OR DROP-OFF-LOCATION DESIGNATED BY THE
COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER OR DESIGNATED ELECTION OFFICIAL, or to
compel, induce, or prevail upon any elector either to give or refrain from
giving the elector's vote at any election provided by law or to give or refrain
from giving the elector's vote for any particular person or measure at any
such election. Each such offense is a class 1 misdemeanor.
SECTION 63. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-13-724, amend (4)
as follows:
1-13-724. Unlawfully carrying a firearm at a polling location or
drop box - exception - legislative declaration.
(4) This section does not apply to a peace officer, as described in
section 16-2.5-101, acting within the scope of the peace officer's authority
and in the performance of the peace officer's LAWFUL duties, EXCEPT AS
OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN SECTIONS 1-13-713 AND 1-13-726.
SECTION 64. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-13-725, amend
(1)(b) and (1)(c) as follows:
PAGE 47-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

1-13-725. False slate of presidential electors - penalties.
(1) (b) A person who knowingly signs, files, transmits, or records
with the secretary of state, the archivist of the United States, the president
of the United States senate, the United States congress, or a Colorado
federal district court judge a list of presidential electors who voted for
candidates for president and vice president of the United States, OR THEIR
SUCCESSORS, who did not receive the highest number of votes in the state
at a general election at which the offices of president and vice president of
the United States were contested commits offering of a false instrument for
recording as set forth in section 18-5-114. If the interstate compact,
"Agreement Among the States to Elect the President by National Popular
Vote", described in part 40 of article 60 of title 24, is in effect and the state's
electoral votes are awarded to the winner of the national popular vote, the
provisions of this subsection (1)(b) shall apply to individuals who sign, file,
transmit, or record a list of presidential electors who voted for candidates
for president and vice president of the United States, OR THEIR SUCCESSORS,
who the secretary of state did not designate as the national popular vote
winner.
(c) A person who has not been elected as a presidential elector in a
general election and who knowingly votes as a presidential elector for
candidates for president and vice president of the United States, OR THEIR
SUCCESSORS, who did not receive the highest number of votes in the state
at a general election at which the offices of president and vice president of
the United States were contested, or who inputs information into a form,
certificate, or other paper or document required of presidential electors that
was not provided by the secretary of state pursuant to section 1-4-304,
commits forgery as set forth in section 18-5-102. If the interstate compact,
"Agreement Among the States to Elect the President by National Popular
Vote", described in part 40 of article 60 of title 24, is in effect and the state's
electoral votes are awarded to the winner of the national popular vote, the
provisions of this subsection (1)(c) shall apply to a person who knowingly
votes as a presidential elector for candidates for president and vice president
of the United States, OR THEIR SUCCESSORS, who the secretary of state did
not designate as the national popular vote winner.
SECTION 65. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-13-726, amend (3)
introductory portion and (6)(b); and add (3)(b.5), (5)(e), and (5)(f) as
follows:
PAGE 48-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

1-13-726. Intimidation of voters or election officials - civil
enforcement - short title - definitions.
(3) Election-related intimidation prohibited. An individual,
whether acting under color of law or otherwise, shall not RECKLESSLY
intimidate, threaten MAKE A CREDIBLE THREAT, or coerce or attempt to
RECKLESSLY intimidate, threaten MAKE A CREDIBLE THREAT, or coerce,
DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, any individual for any of the following:
(b.5) DELIVERING NO MORE THAN TEN MAIL BALLOTS TO A DROP BOX
OR DROP-OFF LOCATION DESIGNATED BY THE COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER
OR DESIGNATED ELECTION OFFICIAL;
(5) Right to enforce.
(e) A DISTRICT COURT THAT HAS JURISDICTION OVER ANY SUIT
BROUGHT PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION MUST EXPEDITE CONSIDERATION OF
THE SUIT AND CONDUCT A FORTHWITH HEARING THEREON. A DISTRICT
COURT MAY ORDER SUCH EQUITABLE RELIEF AS IS WARRANTED BY THE
FACTS AND APPLICABLE LAW AND DO SO ON AN EMERGENCY BASIS IF
WARRANTED.
(f) IF, AT THE TIME OF FILING THE COMPLAINT, AN INDIVIDUAL
DEFENDANT CANNOT BE IDENTIFIED BY NAME BECAUSE THE INDIVIDUAL WAS
WEARING A MASK OR OTHER DISGUISE OR REFUSED TO PROVIDE IDENTIFYING
INFORMATION INCLUDING THE NAME OF THE INDIVIDUAL'S EMPLOYER,
WHETHER AN ORGANIZATION OR GOVERNMENT AGENCY, THE PLAINTIFF MAY
NAME THE UNKNOWN INDIVIDUAL AND THE INDIVIDUAL'S EMPLOYER AS
DEFENDANTS IN THE COMPLAINT FILED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.
(6) Relief.
(b) To prevail in a suit to enforce subsection (3) of this section, a
plaintiff is not required to prove that a defendant intended to intimidate,
threaten, or coerce any individual, except to prove an THAT A DEFENDANT'S
ACTS CONSTITUTED A RECKLESS attempt to, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY,
intimidate, threaten, or coerce A PERSON IN VOTING OR TO REFRAIN FROM
VOTING OR IN DELIVERING NO MORE THAN TEN BALLOTS TO A DROP BOX OR
DROP-OFF LOCATION DESIGNATED BY A COUNTY CLERK OR DESIGNATED
ELECTION OFFICIAL. A court may nonetheless consider evidence of intent in
PAGE 49-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

determining the appropriate relief AND SHALL RETAIN JURISDICTION OVER
ANY ATTEMPTS BY THE NAMED DEFENDANTS TO INTIMIDATE, THREATEN, OR
COERCE VOTING AT THE LOCATION OR LOCATIONS IDENTIFIED IN A SUIT
THROUGH THE DATE OF THE RELEVANT ELECTION.
SECTION 66. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-40-111, amend
(1)(b) as follows:
1-40-111. Notice of circulation - signatures - affidavits -
notarization - list of circulators and notaries.
(1) (b) Any initiative or referendum petition shall be signed only by
registered electors who are eligible to vote on the measure. Each registered
elector shall sign their own signature and shall print their name, the address
at which they reside, including the street number and name, the city and
town, the county, and the date of signing. The circulator of a petition shall
encourage each registered elector signing a petition to sign the petition in
ink. In the event a registered elector is a person with a physical disability or
is a person who is unable to read or write and the registered elector wishes
to sign the petition, the elector shall sign or make their mark in the space so
provided. Any person, other than a circulator, may assist the elector who has
a physical disability or who is unable to read or write in completing the
remaining information required by this subsection (1). The person providing
assistance shall sign their name and address and shall state that such
assistance was given to the elector who has a physical disability or who is
unable to read or write.
SECTION 67. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-40-116, amend (2)
as follows:
1-40-116. Validation - ballot issues - random sampling - rules.
(2) Upon submission of the petition, the secretary of state shall
examine each name and signature on the petition. The petition shall not be
available to the public FOR EXAMINATION for a period of no NOT more than
thirty SIXTY calendar days for the examination; EXCEPT THAT, THE
EXAMINATION MUST BE COMPLETE NO LATER THAN SIXTY-TWO DAYS BEFORE
THE ELECTION AT WHICH THE PETITION ISSUE OR QUESTION WILL APPEAR ON
THE BALLOT. The secretary shall assure that the information required by
sections 1-40-110 and 1-40-111 is complete, that the information on each
PAGE 50-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

signature line was written by the person making the signature, and that no
signatures have been added to any sections of the petition after the affidavit
required by section 1-40-111 (2) has been executed.
SECTION 68. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-40-118, amend (1)
as follows:
1-40-118. Protest.
(1) A protest in writing, under oath, together with three copies
thereof, may be filed in the district court for the county in which the petition
has been filed by some registered elector, within fifteen days after the
secretary of state issues a statement as to whether the petition has a
sufficient number of valid signatures, which statement must be issued no
later than thirty SIXTY calendar days after the petition has been filed;
EXCEPT THAT, A STATEMENT MUST BE ISSUED NO LATER THAN SIXTY-TWO
DAYS BEFORE THE ELECTION AT WHICH THE PETITION ISSUE OR QUESTION
WILL APPEAR ON THE BALLOT. If the secretary of state fails to issue a
statement within thirty calendar days BY THE DEADLINE REQUIRED BY THIS
SECTION, the petition is deemed sufficient. Regardless of whether the
secretary of state has issued a statement of sufficiency or if the petition is
deemed sufficient because the secretary of state has failed to issue a
statement of sufficiency within thirty calendar days, no further agency
action is necessary for the district court to have jurisdiction to consider the
protest. During the period a petition is being examined by the secretary of
state for sufficiency, the petition shall not be available to the public; except
that such period must not exceed thirty calendar days THE DEADLINE
REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION. Immediately after the secretary of state issues
a statement of sufficiency or, if the petition is deemed sufficient because the
secretary of state has failed to issue the statement, after thirty calendar days
BY THE DEADLINE REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION, the secretary of state shall
make the petition available to the public for copying upon request.
SECTION 69. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-33.5-703, amend
(3) as follows:
24-33.5-703. Definitions.
As used in this part 7, unless the context otherwise requires:
PAGE 51-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

(3) (a) "Disaster" means the occurrence or imminent threat of
widespread or severe damage, injury, or loss of life or property resulting
from any natural cause or cause of human origin, including but not limited
to fire; flood; earthquake; wind; storm; wave action; hazardous substance
incident; oil spill or other water contamination requiring emergency action
to avert danger or damage; volcanic activity; epidemic; air pollution; blight;
drought; infestation; explosion; civil disturbance; hostile military or
paramilitary action; a market disruption, including a trade disruption or an
atypical disruption in the market that affects production, distribution, or
consumption of a product or service; or a condition of riot, insurrection, or
invasion existing in the state or in any county, city, town, or district in the
state.
(b) (I) "DISASTER" ALSO MEANS THE OCCURRENCE OR IMMINENT
THREAT OF THE INABILITY TO STRICTLY COMPLY WITH PROVISIONS OF THE
"UNIFORM ELECTION CODE OF 1992", ARTICLES 1 TO 13 OF TITLE 1, FROM
ANY NATURAL CAUSE OR CAUSE OF HUMAN ORIGIN.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (3)(b) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JANUARY 31,
2031.
SECTION 70. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-72-205.5, amend
(4)(b)(II) as follows:
24-72-205.5. Public inspection of ballots - stay period - recounts
- rules governing public inspection of ballots - legislative declaration -
definitions.
(4) (b) In connection with the public inspection of the ballots to
which this section pertains:
(II) The designated election official, or his or her THE DESIGNATED
ELECTION OFFICIAL'S designee, shall cover or redact, based upon the most
practical means available, any markings or message on a ballot that may
identify the particular elector who cast the ballot before the ballot may be
made available for public inspection; EXCEPT THAT, ANY IDENTIFYING
MARKINGS OR MESSAGES VOLUNTARILY MADE BY THE PARTICULAR ELECTOR
WHO CAST THE BALLOT ARE NOT REQUIRED TO BE COVERED OR REDACTED
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (4)(b)(II);
PAGE 52-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

SECTION 71. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 30-1-103, add (1.5)
as follows:
30-1-103. Fees of county clerk and recorders - report - repeal.
(1.5) OATHS OR AFFIRMATIONS FOR PUBLIC OFFICE FILED WITH
COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDERS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 24-12-101
(3) ARE EXEMPT FROM ANY FEES UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 72. Effective date. This act takes effect upon passage;
except that sections 1-7.5-107 (3)(a)(I) and 1-7.5-107 (3)(a)(II), Colorado
Revised Statutes, amended in section 52 of this act, take effect July 1, 2026.
SECTION 73. Appropriation. (1) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year,
$10,000 is appropriated to the department of state. This appropriation is
from the department of state cash fund created in section 24-21-104 (3)(b),
C.R.S. To implement this act, the division of information technology may
use this appropriation for personal services.
SECTION 74. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 53-HOUSE BILL 26-1113

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 54-HOUSE BILL 26-1113